70 & 80 degree gorgeous weather :: walk with Pete and Bella :: end of year hockey party ::
Format: Flac
Eventually we made our way to Port Townsend and did more exploring and EATING! The food was sooooooo good!!
Someday, You will walk among us
Now, that way of covering the business is practically dead, but it wasn't just lack of resources that caused it -- not that Steinberg thinks it was. But I have my own spin on it. Thinking back, that sort of coverage, which amounted to endlessly chasing the same story, was a sign that we were covering a business that had grown incredibly static. Accounts came and went, as did agency owners, as did creative directors, but, at the end of the day, we were simply covering the movement of the same pieces around the industry chessboard over and over again. We didn't realize it at the time, but that's why the bar for what constituted news was so incredibly low.
On the other hand, for those not desensitised, the torture and indignity that they witness will become so unbearable that they will have to switch off entirely, no longer able to place themselves in the victim's shoes. Paradoxically, this means that the character is objectified and any positive message about the evil we do, or
Well it was clear on Friday that he is not the only Malinga of our time as he was joined by another (I’d like to refer to the guy as someone’s dad) male who also knows the Malinga Balerina Dance very well. They did somewhat of a routine together, to a point where I even thought maybe the male is Malinga’s dancer (lol). Mr Malinga was actually joined by a couple of the crowd members on stage and they all danced along.
I’m looking at a copy of Safe Harbor, my baby, that I have propped up on my desk. And what a lovely creature she is with little Tommy on the front cover facing a menacing figure, and a very classy back cover with an anchor pendant on a chain.
Psychopaths can and will lie about many things, even those things you or I would not waste time lying about. Lying can often be uncovered through the many inconsistencies in their 'story' as it evolves over the course of a coaching engagement. If you tape record your sessions, try to follow their patter as it twists and turns in response to your questions and challenges. At some point, it no longer sounds like resistance, but rather game playing. While the psychopath will talk a good game about integrity and honesty, his or her behaviors will speak of pathological lying.
Cat got my tongue?
removed above ground level. The waste pipework can be concealed beneath the shower tray,
In a world where life is expected to be a blur of commitments, expectations and time on task, isn’t it a wondrous pleasure to take the time to read, word for word, line by line; savouring each pleasurable description as if it were a tasty morsel, instead of just cramming it down one’s throat for the sake of sustenance? The utter joy of reading and the ability to read and comprehend: it is a pleasure and privilege beyond comparison.
1) If you are going to cook more than the given quantity here, cook first 1-7 steps in a wide pan and then transfer the content to a pressure cooker to proceed with the remaining step for easy handling.
"Put yourself in the position of Tecumseh of the Shawnee. How would you feel about white immigration to the Americas?"
April: "Yeah, being a rude bitch to me, is what you are. Don't ask me for my fucking opinion if you don't want to hear it!" (So if your daughter doesn't agree with your opinion, that's being a rude bitch?)
Just from the fall till now her skills have improved so much, not just cheerleading but listening skills too. She is so dedicated to being a part of her team, listens to her coach, even tells me that she tries and works really hard. Pretty impressive for a 4 year old. Sometimes I do feel like I'm talking about or posting pictures of a little girl that is way older than her age. I'm really proud of this little girl.
We need one another
36. The first teaching hospital in America, the Baltimore Infirmary was founded by a Glasgow surgeon, Granville Sharp Pattison, in 1816.
Well, nothing but seven suitcases and a bed.
Cook Is Putting Own Stamp on Apple – As CEO, Tim Cook has been putting his own unique stamp on Apple. Here are 10 important decisions Cook has made so far.
Am off to the Party soon and to visit all your wonderful creations. Take care, hugs Annette x
So I am on a quest for my family's stories. I have started writing to aunts and uncles and have asked them to write/type/record stories that they remember about their grandparents. I hope to weave these stories together with a little book my grandmother Helen Shannon wrote about 25 years ago called "A Western Love Affair" about her and Grandpa Cecil's lives in New Mexico and Colorado. Perhaps I can give a bit of honor to their memories and gather up a bit of our history.
Open to all visual artists working in any medium.
Waiting IS NOT something a mother does well when it concerns her child’s health and well-being.
the carpet in the lounge
Development of clean energy, and ultimately elimination of nuclear power plants. I believe Japan would be able to progress further if they could achieve such a difficult goal next, as a country that has been offering cutting-edge technologies to the world.
Now we wish you lots of fun with our challenge.
Q:Please send a list of all doctors in Australia who can dispense rattlesnake serum. ( USA )
Violence is not justified only by what has been done in the past. There must also be a possibility that if violence is not committed, conditions will become worse in the future.
"Trespassing Between Heaven & Hell" by Frank Bill
TRIVIA: Actor Ed Helms never had an adult incisor grow, and his fake incisor was taken out for the parts of filming where Stu’s tooth is missing.
birch catkins
In terms of trade, Ghana exports raw materials like cocoa, gold cotton and timber at less than $50m per annum to China, while imports of cheap Chinese electronics, textiles, plastics etc. flood the market and threaten the precarious position of local manufacturers and merchants.
4. Images of This and That: Photographic images that fit in an Ikea frame – no custom framing required so it’s easy to start your gallery wall!
If ever there were a local cupcake aficionado, it would be Rachel Kramer Bussel, co-founder of the omigod-amazing Cupcakes Take the Cake blog. What are her top five NYC picks?
I knew I needed the course plans. My other deciding factors were:
When he thought it was now okay to talk, he continued. "The Huriken School is now searching for the newest students for the upcoming school year. There’s only a thousand slots for the first years and I was very lucky to get two cards representing two slots. And I had decided to give the two cards to the two of you."
“Keep your hands visible and approach slowly.”
Haste, Mastery, and Crit are your secondary stats, and Haste always comes above the other two, with Mastery coming in above Crit after that.
When she arrived at the shower room Olivia was pleased to see it was not crowded so there would be no wait. Olivia undid the snaps on her jumpsuit and let it drop to the floor. She picked it up and placed it on a hook on the wall. She made a mental note to try to get another clean jumpsuit as soon as possible. Hopefully one with all the snaps in the front.
Alright, I’ve been attracted to girls since I was quite young, I of course had no idea that there was a name for it. I openly accepted that I liked girls when I was near 14 years old. I’ve really struggled with it, because you get a lot of mixed answers and signals on the entire topic. Especially from the church, dear, Lord. God forbid they ever find out, I may just be tied up and set on fire. (That was a joke.)
Text, by offering us control over our message, insidiously asserts its control over us. Naturally, text, the word, does not have a mind of its own. But remember this: word is power and power asserts its control over those who wield it. Think of people corrupted by unbridled power: Mugabe, Gaddafi, Museveni, and on and on. Power left unchecked manipulates, corrupts, and ultimately destroys those who try to use it.
I thought I'd already done a guitar-spotting post a couple of years ago. Not music rooms, like Sheryl Crow's above (although, it's a personal fave), but interiors styled with guitars casually propped here and there for magazine shoots. If I did, apparently I didn't think to label the post with any logical words such as musical instruments or simply guitar.
Bang Gang has a very lush, seamless sound on CD. What kinds of studio gear (plugins, hardware compressors and limiters, etc) do you use to get that sound?
Overall, my first week of school turned out successfully. I met and got a good feel for my professors, and fully know what to expect from my classes.
TX-RPOA E-News
J.G.Chambers with Queensberry branding,
Had the travelling held its weight alongside the colossi battles, it would perhaps have been less necessary to have so many similar fights. I’ve heard the argument that each colossus is meant to be like a traditional “dungeon” in itself, but once you’ve scaled one giant monster, you’ve pretty much scaled them all. You can almost guarantee that one of their weak spots will be on the crown of their head, and when so many of them share the same kind of anatomy, they all start to merge into one – fewer, more memorable colossi would have gone a long way.
So, even if people hurt my feelings (and I fully realize they don’t mean to…they just don’t know what to say to me) I know that God is right there by my side, watching out for me as I go through my days here on Earth. It’s not easy, Carter. It’s not even fun at times, but I know that someday things will be perfect and I will never have to feel the pains (mental/emotional/physical/spiritual) of this world again. That’s where my faith and confidence lie.
Let God be exalted,
Doyle took the paper and smoothed it out. “‘Like Edmond Dantès, my mind is filled with a single thought—my happiness destroyed for no apparent reason. I, too, know what it’s like to be wrongly imprisoned in my own Château d’If’.” He looked at Grayson. “If this is some sort of clue, it’s a damn flimsy one. Besides, it doesn’t make sense. It’s more of a philosophical observation about her life.” He arched an eyebrow, reconsidering. “Or a parting goodbye shot at you. Where did you find this?”
oh that beautiful pair
— Quantity: 1-10 image files
I think this is just a curmudgeonly outburst. Still, if this is how my next 37 Decembers are going to go, this could get rough...
(e) to promote feelings of ill-will and hostility between different races or classes of the population of Malaysia; or
2) Add cooked sauce into the pasta and serve. Add extra cheese and basil.
in any case, i wanted to point you to two sites i have found recently that I think are kind of cool.
Today Rob is going to start shaving away his beard. Having never grown it out before, he didn't realize that his curly whiskers would continually poke and itch him, so the beard must go.
Huge hugs!
- Faerie Queens
Quiet apart from these anomalies, there is good basis in the language of Act No. 671 for the inference that the National Assembly restricted the life of the emergency powers of the President to the time the Legislature was prevented from holding sessions due to enemy action or other causes brought on by the war. Section 3 provides:
The only exception was this:
I live for this time of year, and for the telephone book thickness of American Vogue! Each year it seems that they get bigger and bigger, and this year did not disappoint! I felt like I needed a shopping cart when I was at Border's, buying my $30 dollars (and 30 lbs.) worth of research! I devour every last page, from editorials to advertisements, and have even been known to clip images to create my own Fall (insert year) story board. (I'm a geek, I know) :)
While, I understand the thinking, I also know how dangerous it is. I can promise you sticking your head in the sand and crossing your fingers that the bad guy won't kill you is not a good strategy. Even if one is prepared to die, most are not prepared to live with the aftermath of survival. Death sucks, but living comes with it's own set of issues and in my case, not dying was when the real fight for my life began.
Simply Kan. June 19. Sunshine Valley. Lots of bands. Free show. Free camping. Free love. kannaroo.com.
Well, all I can say is that I’m looking forward to reading them; Innocence Lane especially calls out.
For the coconut icing, combine the powdered sugar and coconut in a bowl, then add the lemon rind and enough lemon juice to make a stiff but spreadable icing. Spread the icing over the cold cake.
Founder and Editor
Mississippi Museum of Art, Jackson, MS (as of 8-31). The Clarion-Ledger reported that the covering over a skylight that was to be repaired blew off. Director Betsy Bradley said that as a result leaks are recurring and ceiling tiles are down in the atrium area. The art was removed prior to the storm and was not damaged. Bradley said the museum will re-open very soon.
I know that I have to take measures to stay emotionally healthy so I make the decision to scream. I'm not screeching more yelling out my emotional pain.
-Hops and carbonation free beverage made from USDA beef or chicken stock
And for those who believe, there are those in our community who treat The Spirit like a drug. They are constantly on the search for their next fix of God and forget that the spirit was sent to us, he wasn’t hidden. They are so intent on the finding a holy altered state that they forget that Jesus said this life and this walk would be hard. But God does not depart.
My internet is out at my house until Tuesday. Honestly, it’s no big deal unless I want to watch some Arrested Development on Netflix….oh well.
Windows 8, as you know, is the upcoming operating system from Microsoft. If you are a Windows fan, you might have to wait a bit more to get the final release of Windows 8. Meanwhile you can satisfy your anxiety levels by downloading the Windows 8 consumer preview from the website of Microsoft. This is basically the beta version of the new OS; this was released a couple of months before. It is good to install this version of Windows 8 on your computer as it will help you to experience the new interface and some of the newly installed features of windows 8; this is very helpful especially when it comes to making a decision on whether to go for Windows 8 or to stay with Windows 7 at time of the final release of the new OS. Talking about whether to buy or not, the one important thing you would like to consider will be the performance. This article provides information regarding the performance of Windows 8 with respect to Windows 7.
Years ago, before the advent of on-line telephone directories and mobile phones Yellow Pages, a UK based telephone directory, ran an advert with an old gentleman wandering around book shops in search of a book on fly fishing. Eventually his daughter hands him the paper copy of the Yellow Pages telephone directory and he rings around until he finds someone that stocks the book. When he gives his name it turns out that its his book that he was searching for.
I miss the simplicity of that time. Third row up, sit two seats over, black binder under chair with pieces ready to be practiced. Sit on seat's edge, stifle a giggle, and stand in unison with the rest of the choir. We know the music...every lilting note, every ebb and flow, every silent pause. This is safe and learned and practiced. It's easy to sing when the music is understood.
"We'll work on it," Ellen promised. "Now, I gotta dash. Lunch was over about 10 minutes ago for me."
The bad thing about being out of the office all week: Playing catch up. Big time.
Materialism has no strength next to me,
Most likely the Obama administration has either cast its lot with the Muslim Brotherhood in the ongoing uprising against the Mubarak government or our government thinks in the power vacuum that will occur in Mubarak’s inevitable fall, the Muslim Brotherhood will likely prevail over other factions and we need to find common ground with this organization. This approach was tried before by the Carter administration during the fall of the Shah in Iran and our embracing of the Ayatollah Khomeini and his minions. It didn’t work out too well and frankly, there shouldn’t be much confidence in working this time either.
Thus we can see that Sarkozy’s close alliance with all things American isn’t some madcap conspiracy theory: it is an established fact in his family, his make-up, his connections, his foreign policy, and his domestic economic politics. It is the major reason for the French Left’s utter distaste for, and distrust of, the current French President.
These police officers have no clue. Because nobody told them that if the person they swear an Oath to is in error, so are they. If the monarch is rendered powerless, so are they, and every single government agent. If I were a copper, and I discovered that my (ultimate) boss had no authority, I would have no option but to resign. And I would do so the moment I knew it to be so.
BUT, you should know that shortly after talking with you last, i loaned my box to my sister. long story short: box got stolen.
If it not all SWP, it's certainly all posh neo-colonialism. Take two non-SWP lovers of the Brown Exotic, Seumas Milne and the ‘right wing' Peter Oborne.
The point is, the image of the two tramps, Estragon and Valdimir gazing out over an alien landscape, makes a lot of sense in relation to these paintings.
One of my aunts has recently started culling her impressive photo collection and gave my siblings and I each a packet of family photos for Christmas. They range from true oldies, like the one you’ll see below, to almost recent ones to flashbacks from the glorious 1980s and 1990s, when bold prints, big hair, and truly ginormous glasses reigned supreme.
Under cross-examination by defense lawyers, Pettite agreed that there was a “fifty-fifty” chance that he misheard Clemens when he testified earlier that “The Rocket” had confided in him that he had taken the drug Human Growth Hormone.
"dictatorship of the financial markets and the troika: EU, ECB and IMF, who have imposed austerity measures and a non-elected government on the Greek people."
I would also like to, as politely as possible, ask, Is there maybe some way you could make yourselves a little less freaky to those of us who are here alone with a baby and have to let you in our houses even though our upper body strength leaves something to be desired and we have trouble fully concealing a stun gun in the waistband of our yoga pants?
There were 3 main Boer Diasporas after the Anglo-Boer War.
Molded and shaped
Pertussis is known as whooping cough because of the “whooping” sound people often make while gasping for air after a coughing fit. A highly contagious bacterial disease, it starts off like a cold but leads to severe coughing that can last for weeks. In rare cases, it can be fatal.
However, like new agents, not all new publishers are created equal. The advent of epublishing and the cheapness of print-on-demand technology has made it extremely easy for just about anyone to set themselves up in business as a publisher, whether or not they have any qualifications for doing so. Inexperienced new publishers may not have the skill or resources to acquire, edit, and design books. They may offer terrible, nonstandard contracts. They may have a poor understanding of marketing and distribution, and their small budgets may severely limit any publicity efforts they do make. The consequence for authors: tiny sales, minimal exposure, and, most likely, no professional credit.
14. The Specters - The Chainsaw Song
What no, I mean no, news organization will ever say in todays climate as it relates to our current national condition is that the demarkation lines are very easily drawn in this ideological war. This is a class war. One side trying to do for the less than equals, and the other is trying to thwart those efforts and work very hard on building wealth for the top ten percent. The thing that is so striking is that the American people without the terminology and vocabulary of a class warfare the American people cannot see to which side they belong or the truth of their situation in the country that they love. All politics in this country is now class warfare. The sooner the greater American people this fact the easier it will be for them to take control of their own political idealism.
Misha
When we arrived at my office, I thought I’d let the student initiate the dreaded picture conversation and see what might happen; I was buying time. At this point, “Lovely, but I can’t see it” was still the only thing I could conceivably think of saying. Subtlety is not a virtue I claim to possess in large quantities–in any quantity actually. To my astonishment, with no prompting from me, Jane Austen student brought out her pictures and, flipping through them, proceeded to describe each and every shot to me in detail. It was as if she were simply sharing her adventure with me, using the pictures as a way to refresh her own memory. She must have spent a good hour with me, describing in detail the landscape surrounding Chawton House and sharing the story behind each picture—like the one of the exit-ramp off the highway where she and her friend had accidentally found themselves when her GPS inexplicably switched from the pedestrian setting to the car setting.
Strength to your faltering spirit,
So I was matching the individual word to have a frequency value, but I should have been matching the input to the nine chords three piece pattern.
I danced, laughed and joked.
Make about ¾ pint of custard from custard powder as per the instructions on the tin. Or you could use a small carton of ready-made custard. When it’s cool enough, spread it carefully over the jelly – if it’s too hot the jelly will start to melt around the edges, but that’s ok because it will set again. Remember to leave enough room on top of the trifle to put the cream. Put the trifle back in the fridge for an hour or so for the custard to set completely.
The price is obviously a set back; with weekend tickets setting folks back often over £200, the initial intimidation to your bank account is surely something that has put many off. To attempt to combat this, sites such as Ticketmaster have brought in a deposit scheme for Reading and Leeds where customers can pay a 25% deposit for their ticket. Whilst speaking in an interview to NME, Festival Republic boss Melvin Benn stated that:
After the struggle, comes the bloom.
Blog my meals, workouts, feelings. I need to continue getting it out there. Also, I need to include more pictures. Must get better about pictures.
During the demonstrations each of the animals and birds were provided with piecs and chunks of raw meat by their trainers. I'm not usually fond of seeing such demonstrations but each of these animals had been raised in captivity and had not been wild caught. Also, children have a rare treat of seeing a live specimen close up working with humans. At the rate habitat for these animals is disappearing it's defintely time to start educating people about how to save them, and in doing so, probably save humans, too, in the long run.
Which shades naturally into the belief that elegance or beauty is a mark of truth. This is a mistake–that the truth is beautiful does not imply that the beautiful is true. A point made beautifully (pun intended) by John Maynard Smith in one of my favorite essays. John asks, ‘What’s the most beautiful scientific idea that ever turned out to be completely false?’ I won’t spoil his answer for you; suffice to say that it’s from biology, and it’s extraordinarily clever and very beautiful indeed.
May the Force be with you!
When the deputy spoke with DeMarco and the passenger in her car, Mary E. Winchell, they “appeared extremely nervous,” the report shows.
JD: One of the great shames of growing up in Northern Ireland in the 1960s-1980s was the way that everything cultural was politicised.
At just 250cc, the CCW Café Racer and Heist Bobber are also smaller than most bikes and a ride in them tagging CCW CEO Scott Colosimo with them will prove if the bikes are a bargain or plain bogus… enjoy.
When you’re ready to cook the meat, put the other half of the oil into the roasting tin with the meat and cook in a oven pre-heated to 180℃. Cook for two hours, basting and turning every 20 minutes. After two hours turn the oven up to 220℃ and brown the meat for 10 minutes. Then take the roast out of the oven and leave it to rest on a wooden board for 10 minutes or so. Meanwhile, pour off the fat from the cooking liquid, add 4 tbls. of hot water and boil briskly on the hob for a few minutes stirring up the bits from the bottom of the tin.
3pm Friday
Okay, I’m taking a break within this break to go get some more food and maybe some more liquor.
So is it wrong to earn money from wet T-shirt and other contests, or get crazy tips simply because of the way you look? Is that degrading to women?
An ideal dise?o paginas web in one that provides a customized solution at an optimum cost. Online businesses definitely have the chance accessto get high profits because of the large amount of people that go online nowadays. However, today’s competition makes success quite a challenge, which is why it would be smart to invest in professional dise?o paginas web. Think about it.
Another thing guys do is they go about things ass-backwards: for a relationship, they insist on sex first and foremost. IF you click, then they are open to a “friendship: that could lead to going out….when it is straight sex, they want to talk and have dinner and get to know you. Really? The few men I have actually been with are lonely misfits (nothing against them)…one is a wimp of the first order who is waiting for his wife to push him towards divorce. He is older, the kids are grown and to hear him tell it..he despises his wife and actually puts all of the family pets in the bed with them so he does not have to touch her, yet when the woman offered him a divorce since he was so unhappy…he refused. Says he is not ready. I have had the guy whose wallet is his dick (sorry, not jumping through hoops), the show-offs ($75,00 cars yet they are on metro), the over-sellers/Supermen who insist that they will be the ones who rock my world….and I am here to say that stamina is overrated. Very much so. I have the game players…they actually show up one time, then make all kinds of dates they cancel at the last minute and wonder why I no longer respond to their emails. I get the fetish guys who secretly lust after incredibly tall and/or BBW women. I got the guy who actually got me to spend my last money to come to his hotel room, only to have him not answer the door. When that happened, I was at first so pissed and wanting to hit something but I had to think about it: if this is the worst that has happened to me doing what I’m doing in this day and age, I am pretty freaking lucky.
To tape off the scene of the slaughter.
* Singin' in the Rain: The Best of Cliff "Ukulele Ike" Edwards. He was the voice of Jiminy Cricket, the sweet-voiced guy who crooned "When You Wish Upon a Star" and "Give a Little Whistle"in Walt Disney's Pinocchio.
"It's a popsicle mold, you know, for making popsicles with," I maturely demonstrated by grasping my plastic bunny by the ears and popping it's head off from the cup tray, sticker eyes staring oddly back at my housemate who is also a doctor.
I planted WAY too many peas--possibly of some super sucky variety so they do not taste good off the vine-I have 4 gallons in the fridge already. Should I stir fry them or freeze them? or Shell them?
Ahead of the visit of Chelsea to The Emirates this weekend, the news is quite mixed. Seeking equilibrium on scales is not going to work with Abou Diaby‘s 45 minutes of action in a friendly against Oman not balancing out fears over Mikel Arteta’s season being over, by a long shot. Or lead weight, whichever you prefer.
There’s more cuteness when the Joseon Crew + 1 take a break and the guys learn to eat cup noodles by copying Park Ha. Evil Sister calls her for a chat so she drives to the hospital she’s at (Dead Micky’s grandma is sick) to meet her and naturally takes the guys on the ride with her. She tells them to stay put then goes in to meet her sister.
For this numerous award winner, it’s about her belief system, which is, “dance has the power to transform, educate and help people to see the world in a different light”. With this drive, she has worked with people with mental health, eating disorders and the military. She insists that an income stream it important but passion is needed to keep the focus even when things do not fall in place and consistency is key to surviving as a business owner as you may need to submit that idea/concept over and over and to a number of places before it yields profit. But that 1 success changes the hurt of all the previous denials, therefore, the wins should be celebrated every time. Also, she says, it’s important to have a board that insists on results and would always be involved in the process giving checks and balances.
Yearly visits from one of my dearest friends, Lisa
Ayuda volunteers all unanimously agree that combos should always be considered a critical part of our service package due to the high levels of these viruses in our region. It also seems to us that if we’re going to spend the time and resources sterilizing animals, we need to go the extra step and ensure their safety from preventable diseases. After all, Ayuda is all about the care and well-being of dogs and cats, not just the reduction of population.
The winter review also has the winterguard! Winter guard is a color guard activity performed indoors where the guard will perform a choreographed show to some recorded music. There are many different types of equipment they use such as flags, rifles, and sabres. Otherwise they might just do some dance in between.
Cass decides it’s time to teach Tara a lesson she’ll never forget. And so begins a series of events that will change the lives of these girls forever...
I was exhausted. I couldn’t think straight, the house was a mess because everything was getting on top of me, and the children were getting on my nerves. I’d shout at them for the least thing, and the food I served them was rubbish. We’d become completely dysfunctional and I was scared of where we were heading.
Rating: 8/10. It's not Anchor Steam, but it's a very well put together beer in the American Ale style. I am a big fan; if you like Fat Tire but wish it had some more hops, this beer would be right up your alley. Go get some.
Leopold Bloom visits the National Museum principally to contemplate the arses of the statues within. There were a number of arseholes in here when we dropped by, too, but we didn't find them arousing in the way Bloom did. Autres temps, autres mœurs.
Why can't I get your perfect, creamy, chocolate goodness out of my mind?
I hope everyone is having a safe and happy Monday!
The definitions for growth and success vary widely, from the basic need of financial security to extreme appetites that include market domination and becoming a bazzillionaire?!
That never touch with inarticulate pang?
I had 2 sleeping bags, cushions and a thick blanket that I used to keep on the top shelf in our walk in robe. After the success of the box space bags I thought I would get one that I can store underneath the bed.
I used to check-in a lot; to gain “badges”, “mayorship” and the coupons you get with being “the mayor of OMG THIS IS MY FAVORITE BAR” but after hearing this story I’ve definitely made the conscious decision to cut back on my check-ins. I think my safety is more important than digital badges and free food.
All my diocesan brothers are out of school back home. If I used the word jealous, I would be understating my current state. Enjoy fellas!
Here is the only picture taken on their camp out.....
I love, love, love being able to put a bunch of stuff in the crockpot and come home from work to a deliciously cooked dinner! This was so easy and was really yummy! It got two thumbs up from my husband so we will definitely be doing this again soon. I served it over brown rice and topped it with green onions, cilantro, sour cream, cheese, and avocado slices. Yum!
4. Carefully remove the baking dish from the oven, remove the foil and let the ramekins cool slightly. Using tongs remove the ramekins from the water and set on a towel to cool for at least 2 hours before serving. Once cooled completely, the flan can be refrigerated for up to 3 days before un-molding and serving.
“Another half mile. We’re almost there.” She said, despite the occasional return fire. Things were becoming sporadic, but that did not mean the Neos were giving up. This change in the status quo meant that they had their prey on the run and it was only a matter of time…
Meanwhile it was announced yesterday that Mr Assange’s legal team will be led by the prominent Australian-born barrister Geoffrey Robertson QC, who has flown back from Sydney to take on the case. Mr Robertson, who has been involved in a number of high-profile human rights cases, could take the appeal against the granting of extradition to Sweden all the way to the Supreme Court, with legal proceedings stretching into months.
Well, she went to a Blogger Conference this week! Yep, they have them. Not only did she go to one...it was in the Opryland Hotel in Nashville. If you have never been there- it is HUGE and GORGEOUS! I won a trip to the CMT Music Awards in 2009 and while I didn't stay there, my friend and I went and visited it...got lost in the MASSIVE COMMUNITY that is the Opryland Hotel.
How many sleepless nights
January 4, 2010
Take kindly the counsel of the years,
When the nationalities of the 9/11 hijackers were revealed, it turned out that 15 out of 19 were Saudi nationals, with four others coming from the UAE (two), Egypt and Lebanon (one each). Yet the U.S. preferred to soft pedal the issue, choosing instead a mythical Al Qaeda and the unfortunate Taliban as the main culprits.
As Jane and Christian continue to look into Del's disappearance they start to uncover a sinister and dark side of the club and its members. Soon they are both fighting for their own survival as well as Del's.
The effects this time out are even more plentiful with swirling stars, endless Tie Fighters, two-legged Imperial battle walkers, miles of exposed metal framework of the Death Star II wrapping around Rebel Fighters swooping in and out of beams to avoid attack and/or collision, speeder bikes speeding and swerving through Endor’s gnarled forests. It’s said there were three times more effects here than in the first film. I believe it.
Bernd Boente, manager of Vitali and Wladimir Klitschko, dismissed Haye as a future contender and were rude to him, acting as if he were not in the room.
561500 Travel arrangement & reservation services
They just fit into the rectangular mold I had and turned out great! I did have some technical issues due to a snowstorm on Easter but with lots of hard work I hand-layered over and over Ice Resin to make it nice and glossy so it will last forever.
Rest assured, I will continue to share my infrequent adventures in crafting and cooking here. But I hope you'll also join me on my new journey! It wouldn't have been possible without you.
So – I’m going to be suspending this blog for the next week. I’ve two interviews for jobs and I’m nervous as all sin so I don’t think my mind will really be in a good mode to go in and be all … literary … (well, beyond reading some Dickens – but that’s my fun reading).
Blast Off! Monkeyin Around CS Stickers
View From Front
I’m delighted Erzsi (pronounced "aire-zshee") has agreed to be interviewed on Absolute Vanilla .
one beat skips for you.
The Boston Phoenix Noted Romney's Statements "Are The Actions Of A Man Desperate To Cater To The Whims Of His Audience." "It is not just that these are untruths. They are the actions of a man desperate to cater to the whims of his audience. What they want, he must appear to be. This is the opposite of leadership - the opposite of the actions taken by his father in the 1960s." (The Boston Phoenix, 12/21/2007)
Interviewer: In some Islamic countries, there is a complete ban on building churches. What is your view on this?
Phone: 678-815-1584
hello my dears. allow me to introduce myself. my name is bre. bre vandecamp, and I am a certified pearl clutcher. i have been watching you all very closely for the past year and am ready to make my judgment upon you. allow me to address you ladies one by one in order of severity.
The funny thing is, that they genuinely believe that they’ve ‘won the argument’, and that ‘you’re an idiot who doesn’t know your foot from your face’.
When we eat raw nuts, we also eat the enzyme inhibitors that prevent the seed from sprouting on the grocery store shelf. This takes a real toll on our digestion, since these enzyme inhibitors also prevent our own bodily enzymes from breaking down the food in our digestive tracts, inhibiting absorption of precious vitamins and minerals. Although we’ve been led to believe eating handfuls of raw nuts everyday is tops for our health, this practice in fact, is extremely hard on our digestion.
Like who?
How did it happen, I wondered? What safer arrangement was there and how did it go wrong? Did love creep in, tiny like a seed, only to grow larger and blossom with each shared meal, every night spent together? And the mystery of it all, why it would grow on one, and not on the other. Suddenly, I realize there was only one thing left to do.
Tchah!
Having received a large demand and requests from sisters Ashia decided to begin Abayah Collection in order to meet this demand. Having researched and investigated a variety of suppliers over a period of a year and a half she was able to work with a verity of suppliers which allowed her to put her creative passion into action, Ashia comments that although it has been a long journey ‘it has been worth the effort, I love seeing sisters come and liking the variety of Abaya’s on offer, it gives me a real buzz when I see sisters in my abaya's on the road or at event’s.
2. Can I change the content of my site to become #1 in the search engines? No. It used to be a lot easier to manipulate the search engines through your own content. Then the search engines smartened up and they developed ranking methods that the site owner is not in direct control of — such as the popularity of the site. Content is only one small piece of determining search engine placement.
- Goal #2: steroid series considered complete (Sunday at 1:30am)
Its been a lovely trip, seen again a few old sights, seen a few new ones too, and indeed the Amtrak station in the midst of a much needed makeover. One really good point, it wasnt work, I needed the break! I’m not saying I’m ready, or willing to go back there, but all the same… I did see some really nice looking apartments en route to Seattle from the light rail, but was good, and didnt make an appointment to look at them, in case the temptation was too great.
Those poor lunch ladies couldn’t get a break—as if they were solely responsible for the nasty food served in so many school cafeterias.
The British government has tried -- unsuccessfully -- to reverse the tide of Islamic separatism in Leicester. In June 2008, for example, the city hosted the first in a series of road shows designed to tackle the problem of honour-based violence . Leicester has been plagued by forced marriages, kidnappings, physical and mental abuse of women, and other honour-based violence crimes against those who have not, according to family and local community members, conformed to religious or cultural expectations.
the ones where i meet myself for what feels like the first time
Much closer to home it has been nose drippingly cold. Air rushes west as Antarctica sighs out one last winter breath, cold, bringing rain to the coast and snow to the hills. The window on the mountain world - the snow cams - have been icing up invitingly, and the temperature stayed has stayed low. The weekend approaches, and local snow becomes a possibility, a probability and finally a plan. Excitement grows in the small people. Snow is frequent in their books, but to them is it also an unknown. It could just as well have been the dark side of the moon, known but unreachable. Snow ball fights, snow men, snow angels, sledge runs; a winter that actually looks like the ones in the important imported books.
Real life is scary right now.
Having woken up to grey clouds (suitably poetic as they are), with the prospect of marking the exam scripts of, oh I don’t know, ninety whiny pubescent teens, and perhaps the most frightening of all – facing the horror of the local tax offices – the promise of butterflies and rainbows was but a mere whisper.
It is so awesome to see students inspired enough to bring art home and do it for homework. I have a four day weekend and I have grad school homework to do that I've been putting off. . . wish I felt inspired to do it!
But then have we come to think of what would be the things that we may miss when all can be done online? Surely we all want our lives to be hassle free; we want to be able to make more of our time and it can be possible if we get to accomplish our obligations without the need to spend more time and resources. With less investment on our part such as time, money and energy we are able to make more for less. The use of computer and the internet has amazingly made it possible. Such as what was mentioned earlier about the snail mail to e-mail. Before, it took days to receive a letter from someone we knew and we had to wait days to get a response to our mail. But now with e-mail and chat features it just takes a second to send a missive and as short as seconds also to get a response depending on how fast the recipient can encode his/her message. It gets even more sophisticated now because video chat has been developed and is now used widely. We need not have to waste our time doing drafts from scratch papers and then re-writing it on a nice and clean paper, enclosing it in an envelope, then go to the nearest post office to buy stamps to send to the recipient. With the communication technology you don’t have to spend a lot of time and money from writing to sending, you can do it all with so little time and cost at your convenience. However, though technology has been so helpful, many who had experience with the traditional way of writing a letter find something valuable in the previous way of sending a letter. They say that hand written letters appears to be more personalized and thoughtful since it was personally hand written by the sender allotting time and effort as much as thoughts in making the missive hence it also serves as a strong, tangible proof of the sender’s thoughts and intents to the recipient.
I love they they are "allowed" to look different from each other. Yay a fabulous bride! I wanted to embrace their own personalities, add a little more than the usual bridesmaid look but still keep a nuptial note. I would have loved my girls to be so vibrant.
My dad would probably get arrested for child endangerment today.
For now I am waiting for the leaves to come back to the trees
Then we walked past Marine Ices looking decidedly chilly and out of place in the snowy landscape. This is our fave family icecream parlour and I don't remember ever seeing it in the snow.
Lauren Nelson was crowned Miss America 2007. She received the prestigious TOYA award (Ten Outstanding Young Americans) by the United States Junior Chamber Organization in 2008. Lauren serves many charities including Children's Miracle Network. She is a co-anchor at KWTV-News9, the CBS affiliate in Oklahoma City. Lauren loves teaching Bible studies and leading worship with her husband. www.withunveiledfaces.com
The family get together with my husbands family is looming. I hate these. Every year I screw them up. The thing is I am not a gifter.
Among the more notable American styles is Prairie, popularized by Frank Lloyd Wright but practiced in various forms throughout the country. Prairie homes are typically long and low with deep roof overhangs; windows are often grouped together. Porches are common and usually supported by massive columns. The Prairie style wasn't in fashion long but strongly influenced hundreds of thousand of "ranch" homes across the country.
a muster of crows,
Out of the shades I showed you in this post, the blue from the mini set is my favorite. They're all great shades that I would wear.
The next phase for me I typically am too quick with, I think. Whole class work where I solicit ideas and suggestions from the class. It's a bit close to my novice teaching style for comfort, so I think I under use it. You can often gauge in a demonstration when students want more responsibility, or when you've seen some developing use of your objective process. The positive reason I skip more quickly to whole class-students lead-I support is because I want students to have the experience of trying without knowing how. If they can get used to that feeling of 'maybe I could...' it will make them so much stronger as problem-solvers. You can also do this phase in groups with active support from you, and I think this is easier with heterogenous groups.
It has many wings and flavours
Stay Up Late lyrics
I woke up this morning thinking I was going to cut back on the cookies for the week and a half up to Christmas...ha. Yeah right.
The case of a lay-reader "asked to refrain from ministry" in the diocese of Southwark following (apparently) his suggestion that people might sign the Coalition for Marriage petition will, I suspect, add fuel to the flames in that already unhappy diocese.
Introverts unite! What are you? Introvert or extrovert? (You might not know off-hand. Find a book/quiz/something and figure yourself out. It might surprise you.)
There is a statement in the Zohar, that God looked at the Torah, and from it, learned how to create the world. Istakel b’orayta v’bara alma. What this means, is that Torah isn’t only a text, but that the world, and everything in it, reflects Torah. When we look at our families and friends, and we work on our relationships—we are studying Torah. When we build communities and come together in comradeship—we are studying Torah. And when we look at Israel, at the people, at the land, and we work on our relationship with it, too, and don’t shy away from the hard parts but approach them with love and strength and commitment, we are also studying Torah.
*the series we are going through at church has been amazing and i have been so challenge and am growing so much. Even the things i wrestle with...that still promotes growth.
But Maggie stood right saie astonish'd,
before him there is a consuming flame,
I saw a girl the other day who reminded me of you. She was riding in the back of a pickup with her ears flapping and her tongue hanging out. She was a Yellow Dog too, although her coloring wasn’t nearly as pretty as yours. I smiled, remembering your big brown eyes and velvety-soft, floppy ears.
Tongues lap in masks
Let’s see. 1994. 1994. Oh! That’s right! On 21 August 1994, the Illinois State Senate seat ‘officially’ opened up! Its occupant, Alice Palmer – for whom “Barack Obama” was working – could now set her sights on indicted Mel Reynolds’ Congressional seat.
Both in town and site planning it is important to prevent the complete separation of different classes of people which is such a feature of the English modern town….
Here I am writing this out, thinking only of myself and of times gone by.
When family, four or two-footed, is gone, what do dogs do?
You will recall Miranda's winning pitch:
I don't think I introduced myself on the blog yet, although you've met the DT you've not met me! I'm the Editor of Scrap365 (and also of Craft Stamper), I've been scrapping for about 6 or 7 years. Although I do love to rubber stamp, scrapbooking was my first crafty love (though I dabbled in many others previously).
Her pieces are amazing! So delicate, mixed with a modern simplicity that any girl can wear.
We took the Highway 1 from San Francisco to Monterrey, stopping at the brilliant Swanton Berry Farm Stand which is a couple of miles north of Davenport. Jim and Kate were cold and wet after a naked dash into the sea (see above) and we were collectively seduced by their super delicious Mexican Hot Chocolate, cooshty sofas, variety of pies, honesty box and free reign of a backgammon board. Certainly worth a visit if you ever find yourself on that stretch of road with a rumbling tummy.
(Click on the photos to enlarge)
So, lets examine ‘fear’ up close. First, ask yourself what you’re really afraid of? In the example of the car payment, are you really fearful of loosing your car? Or is this more about the discomfort of negotiating with the finance company to make partial payments or maybe even ask a relative for a loan? Maybe you’re just tired of the struggle and the discomfort is causing you to react to the situation in a more negative way. Will you die or be physically threatened over getting behind on your car payments?
Anna will be doing research on the Bulk SMS Market in the UK, so we can promote the company more effectively. Also she will be doing a bit of blogging and maybe a customer service survey of our customers to determine what our customers like about the service and product plus any opportunities they would like to be added to make the prodcut better for them.
Martha experienced many mystical and magical moments during her pregnancy. I am envious. I could use some magic. I would love to have a voice guiding me. Something to help me know I am on the right path with Noah.
So now, I will regale you the tales of my plight. I will sing you the song of these hateful, stupid, over-entitled little beasts who think that paying a bill each month entitles them to treat technical support or customer service like their servile pets. Here, I will spread awareness and I hope that each and every one of them stumbles across this and knows that despite my saccharine, sing-song tone and my pleases and thank yous, that I was inwardly cursing them to a lifetime in hell of sleeping in flea-ridden blankets and drinking nothing but rotten Yoohoo for all of eternity.
This is the step where belief in something greater than ourselves becomes a necessity.
But as she looked up from the mail, there were the boots staring right at her almost as hard as she was staring at them. She stopped to admire the intricate detail and craftsmanship that had escaped her all the other times she’d seen them. Maybe because then they’d been moving. But here they were - still - allowing her time to really notice things she hadn’t seen before. The fine sterling silver tips. The little moons and stars cut into the toepieces. The bright, golden sunlight reflecting off them because of the blinding shine. The polished, flathead silver tacks that held the toepieces in place. No doubt about it, these were quality boots.
And who knows what, or who, is round the corner?
I pushed send.
feeling run down and sluggish
So I say, Life is short. Love the one you're with, the husband, the wife of your youth. I can't think of anything sweeter than waking up each day with the man I love sleeping next to me--even if we both snore!
Not that I'm complaining, since the way I see it is this is part of what you sign on for when you get married.
Awesome can’t describe soccer. I’m not one to stereotype (except against violent Nyeri women and psychopathic Kisii men) but honestly I will never understand men who don’t watch soccer. Its strange. Almost gay even. Actually very gay. GAAAAAY! What are you doing when people are watching football? You’re touching yourself aren’t you? You sad lonely man.
Paper - Coredinations White Cardstock, MME Kraft Funday Collection, Bo Bunny Patterned Paper
Tears glistened in all our eyes. All four of us bound towards the stairs simulataneously, and ran down together, hand in hand. ‘Here they come!’ our neighbours taunted as we got down and reached them, standi ng in a group. A lamp-post in the building compound was the only thing vibrating and shaking at that moment, bearing mute testimony of what had happened a few minutes ago.
*I received these books from Tommy Nelson Publishers for review. The opinions are my own and I have not been compensated by Tommy Nelson Publishers.
Here is what we made last week at our party:
From the boughs of the gnarled old oak tree across the street, Windracer watched her enemy fall to the grass where he thrashed about and clawed at his throat. At last he grew still and victory was hers.
It was such a great time that I had with Dear Cloud! I came to know each of the members better during the interview. At the end of the interview, they also left a shout out to all the fans through their facebook fan page, to thank all who have been supporting them and to give a lot of love to Bright Lights:
It is definitely time to take action. Did you read Melissa's acronym for action? I love it!
Select the bottle caps. We used beer bottle caps, but any bottle caps will do.
'I thought I was all alone.'
I hope you win!
I adore Seanan McGuire and the world of Faerie she’s built up around October “Toby” Daye, her changeling (half-human, half-fae) heroine. She’s put Toby through the wringer in each of the three previous novels and, after the events of A Local Habitation, I wasn’t sure things could be more stressful for Toby but I was wrong. So gloriously wrong. She has once again created a layered adventure for Toby to navigate, all the while answering questions that I, at least, have been wondering, like what happened to Rayseline and Luna when they were kidnapped, what will be the repercussions for killing Blind Michael, or what’s the Caite Sidhe court really like. There are other questions answered in the novel but to mention them here would be to spoil, which I try not to do, though I may have just spoiled the end of A Local Habitation for you just then. (If that’s the case, I apologise, but then have to ask: Why are you reading a post about a book that comes after one you haven’t finished??)
Each night, Kata snuck through the forest to the terrorist village. He ducked past guards looking for him and slipped in Kanhar’s back door. The family of seven sat waiting to learn new Bible stories and to pray.
plus lots of brand spanking new retailers as well
June 29 Hartford, CT XL Center
In those days fresh with youthful ecstasy
The Night Angel trilogy by Brent Weeks
I don’t know about you, but I’m beginning to see more and more of this type of behavior with smartphones in public/dangerous situations. My hope is that lawmakers /politicians /parents / siblings/friends will start doing whatever it takes to ensure we (globally?) don’t allow this to be the next social epidemic.
Speaking of dickheads, Anheuser-Busch brought out a ‘Bud Pong’ game kit in 2005. They claimed that the game was not meant to encourage under age or binge drinking because the game was intended for use in bars and not campuses and because its rules called for the use of WATER instead of beer. But it is designed to be played in bars. With water. What the ...!?
refined / sunflower oil: 110 ml
Body By Bethanny – So far I am pleased with this yoga dvd after only having done it a few times. Bethanny and the yoga instructor chat a lot but once I get focused I tend to tune it out. This isn’t your meditative yoga, but its great for balance and strength building.
I now believe Mitch might've been praying the same prayer. When I arrived home and set about his care, his headache was a reported 15 on a 1-10 scale. I began the Instant + Long Morphine + Marijuana Cycle to bring down his number. Nothing worked. I turned to light the vigil candle before the VirginMotherofGod and when I turned back 'round, Mitch's mood had shifted. "She scares me," he said again; apparently she'd been scaring him for a few days now. I wondered if she was hovering near, waiting to deliver him to the other side. I comforted him with some soothing words of her kindness and grace, of her gifts of faith and love. He seemed to buy it and fell asleep.
I pine for a porch.
…. and maybe I’ll discover a way to rid myself of these hot flashes, too! ….. Or maybe thats asking too much from a business trip….
Please include your name, address, and t-shirt size you would like.
A while ago, when I outed myself to the whole church congregation, he’s the one who stood up and said my sexuality doesn’t matter to him. I’m glad it doesn’t. I’m glad he accepts me as I am without question. I’m glad that seems to be the case with most of those I have loved for so many years. That said, while it doesn’t matter to him, it does to me, because in revealing myself to my world and walking out into the light, which is where all of us belong, leaves me the opportunity to truly become who I am and realize myself for real. This is who I always was; I wasn’t able to show it before, because sometimes I wasn’t sure who to show it to and to whom I should keep it hidden. Being gay leaves one questioning many things, not just about oneself, but about all the other selves one comes in contact with; who will be happy with one being oneself, and who won’t? It’s a question someone isn’t “out” has to ask themselves constantly. I’m done with those questions now. I am myself, without apologies.
Game Nutz Podcast: Adventure 16
Their national numbers are
I’m not there. Where I am is too distal to be perceived from afar. My space does not cast off light that takes seven minutes to reach the human eye. My space is cast back against the total support of an immovable object.
“Yah. ‘Cause one daddy’s gonna’ find out she’s in love with a nigger from the streets…’ Remember that line from the cd?”
This is a young girl, in college. I have not yet had the privilege to meet her as this is her first trip. She has never been to China and just randomly found the trip and felt God say GO. These young girls on my team, I am certain God placed them there for ME to learn from. Because I am sure there are MANY things a girl her age could use the extra money on. But she is choosing to SHARE it with a team of people she does not even know.
Here is my first attempt at making the scarfe and a sort of tutorial.
Law #6: A computer is only as secure as the administrator is trustworthy
Those Who Have Risen (Dying Music 2004)
Since the end of surgery, I'm hovering very close to what the websites all agree is the "optimum" weight for my age, height and build, which is fine, but I'm still feeling bulbous and slightly blobby. Flabby and out of shape mostly, from a year of lying around moaning and complaining.
A few weeks ago I stumbled upon Polyvore and I want to know where has this site been all my life? I know that it has been around for some time, but I would have loved to have found this site years ago. I guess the good thing is that I have now found it and I cannot wait to start creating different looks.
Thomas M. Ray was apparently at his home near Grand Bay in the fall of 1861, for Mary delivered another daughter the following spring: Sarah Jane “Sallie” Ray was born May 23, 1862. According to a history of the Wiregrass area published by the Coast Plain Area Planning & Development Commission, Thomas M. Ray began operation of the grist mill, known as “Knight and Ray’s Mill” on November 7, 1863.
For this recipe, I used rice since I had it already cooked in the refrigerator. Any cooked grain can be used, like quinoa or barley. I started with frozen fronds and thawed them. The mushrooms released quite a bit of water that I squeezed out of the fronds before placing them into the food processor. This flavorful water can be used to make a vegetarian gravy later or just discarded. The amount of breadcrumbs varies, depending on how wet the fronds are, so use enough to make the burger patty hold its shape.
I’ll be watching to see if The King’s Speech, along with actors, Colin Firth – Best Actor nominee, Geoffrey Rush – Best Supporting Actor Nominee, Helena Bonham Carter – Best Supporting Actress Nominee, will take home the Oscar for Best Picture. It’s also nominated for Best in: Art Direction, Cinematography, Costume Design, Directing, Film Editing, Music (Original Score), Sound Mixing and Writing (Original Screenplay).
Pressure-release.
Destroy Tox Boxes
Ha! Right.
Not any more. With so much of the job involving technology and with a focus now on finding and sharing information beyond just what is available in books, a new type of librarian is emerging — the kind that, according to the Web site Librarian Avengers, is “looking to put the ‘hep cat’ in cataloguing.”Oh snap! That guy really is a Library Avenger. Uh-oh, I have late fees from 1986 (book: "Are You There God, It's Me TAN" also known as "Ketel 1-and-Cranberry"), ... and now I'm kind of scared.
tangled in rotten black weed,
* Challenge: I eat every 2-3 hours. Eating out every 2-3 hours isn’t always an option and is very expenisve. Solution 1: Find a grocery store in Vegas to buy healthy and portable snack options. Solution 2: Pack and bring healthy and porable snack options with me. Opted for: Solution 2
I get to learn how to take x-rays. Of the feet, that is. I am going to be the bestest foot x-rayer ever.
Arkham City (Alternate Version of R.Kelly’s Gotham City)
No one has spoken since the events had taken place. Maybe they are waiting for the others, or maybe they are in mourning. Either way I just wish someone would discuss putting the body in the ground and allow her to rest.
21. A warranty for a Black & Decker appliance
But who shall dare
It was at that point when I realized if I want to continue this madness it would probably be best if I got a new bike. I made it back to the shop and went on-line to see what was out there. I was feeling rather sore on my butt and my hands throbbed in pain. Thank you RA. I was thrilled to find that there were bikes that didn't just use hand brakes, as that would have been a deal-breaker for me. I found a couple of coaster bikes that used foot brakes, so immediately asked my husband to put down the wrench and fire up the jalopy, I mean pick up truck.
The Mission: iPossible! Group
I do not like it in a house.
What starts as an ordinary summer turns exciting and perilous for twins Ruby and Simon when strange occurrences begin happening on their farm -- sudden gusts of wind, rainstorms, and even tornado warnings -- that seem eerily timed to Simon's emotions.
I just finished Run Your Butt Off!: A Breakthrough Plan to Lose Weight and Start Running (No Experience Necessary!), which I loved; as well as finally getting to Tim Challies' The Next Story: Life and Faith after the Digital Explosion, which was also interesting, and I'm almost finished with A Year by the Sea: Thoughts of an Unfinished Woman by Joan Anderson (which isn't as depressing as it sounds). I had already read one personal pick in January, and as I mentioned above, I've started another, so I'm on my way to completing five, with 2 more on my list this month.
I'm not really excited about this sort of hexagon, today's #7, but I'm loving my row of green crochet gathering on the window sill and thinking about where I'm going to hang them in the kitchen when they are done.
We still haven't met our human neighbours on our left hand side, but we have met our neighbour on the right hand side. A rather pleasant fellow with 31 years of allotment experience, he has 2 plots and has very traditional growing methods. He is full of advice and is also kean to encourage people to try something new. He grows grapes for wine and has given almost every single tenant on the site a grape vine he has cultivated himself. I have one on my plot that was given to the last holder of plot 114.
I went for the two part nuclear stress test on December 1st and 2nd. The first day I had to run on the treadmill and tell the nurses when I thought I was one minute away from being at the point where I didn’t feel like I could go on any more and then they would inject me with radioactive dye that would settle in the arteries that supply my heart muscle. After the treadmill portion of the test I had to wait 45 minutes and then have my heart photographed over a period of about another 45 minutes (I got a nice nap while laying on the machine). Several times during this day I was told that the results from the first days testing would be read that afternoon or evening and that I may get a call telling me that I would not need to come back if the results clearly showed that my heart was ok – again, nobody thought that I would really be having any real issues at this point in my life. They also told me not to be concerned if I got a call asking me to come back for the second half of the test, and that if they did want me to come back it didn’t necessarily mean that they had found something bad. That evening I got the call from the hospital, they wanted me to come back. I wondered what that could mean…
If there ever was a time when you loved me,
Trin-Gyi-Pho-Nya: Tibet’s Environment and Development Digest. January 12, 2004, Issue 4.
All but about a million of them are U.S. citizens — though I don’t think we should start getting technical about place of birth when it comes to child poverty.
I have talked about this before. My dear blogger friend Separated Dad (I would link you to him but it’s complicated. Here is his old site) posted a comment today that was part of a collective message that I received today. He wrote
I would say that anyone in our industry of economic development is normally not the most beloved person of the media, because we recommend the invest of taxpayers monies in order to create the right atmosphere for these types of outcomes to occur. If they were going to occur naturally I think the outcome would already be well down the road. Thus it takes strategic thinkers, visionary leaders, and supporters that want a better tomorrow to agree on taking some form of calculated risk at the expense of their constituents. For sure these are not easy decisions to make. But over the course of a lifetime of service to our profession we do learn the most efficient process for getting to the nub of the matter and making hard choices. Usually those of us in this public spectacle get our fair share of naysayers and critics. With the advent of bloggers we sure draw in many cases our share of unwarranted abuse by uninformed and sometimes malicious and usually people who had no experience and/or involvement in the actual projects being discussed, they are just arm chair experts, with no experience themselves in being game changers, and adding measurable value to our society. Perhaps that is why we draw their negative attention so much.
haven't had much time for taking pictures,
ME: *Interrupting* You know what? Fine. X-ray away to your heart’s content. I wouldn’t want my Jethro Tull T-shirt * to mess with science.
Another point of interest is the regional variation in Hofstede’s popularity, which stands out in Denmark and the Netherlands (and is quite high in Australia interestingly, though so are Mead and Farmer), but drops back closer to the level of other names in, say, the UK. In the US, by contrast, Mead and Farmer are streets ahead.
L’Ermitage, c. 1897, via Wikimedia Commons.
Srimad Bhagavatam
See Woods 1994 students cope with change and instructors need to explain and rationalize, as students go through a grieving process since PBL is so different that traditional learning. Suggests instructors move from informal collaborative learning to macro-level PBL.
These three repetitive things everyday – weekends included – are good habits that, I feel, allow me to achieve excellence, not only in my business but in my social life.
We believe Jesus Deceives People (Ezekiel 14:9 KJV).
One thing I realized about the arena as Ratner was slicing his hands through the air to demonstrate the sharp angles involved: What Ratner's Forest City Ratner has been selling as a negative may very well be a negative they are trying to disguise. The company keeps saying that the arena will have exceptionally good sight-lines. It turns out that what this means is that the viewing stands will be exceptionally steep, steeper (Ratner was saying) than any other arena in the country. Desirable? It is likely not being done because it is desirable but as a consequence of trying to cram the arena into a very tiny footprint given the way it is hemmed in by surrounding streets. Viewers are likely to find themselves tucking their chins down on their chests to see down the steep angle. There are psychologists who will tell you that this is frequently counterproductive to getting people into good moods: It sort of goes along with the expression or concept of being "downcast" about something.
A loooong, looong time ago I posted a wishlist on this very blog with that exact little tray on it, and I found it locally for $3! I was so happy, and I can totally get over that little stain that just won't come off. Gives it character, right? The little mushroom embroidery was a mere $2 and looks adorable hanging over our stove. I think our kitchen is finally fully decorated. (btw, those little sticks are the stems of incense, I collect them on the coffee table and throw them away when the tin lid is full because I am that lazy to throw them away individually)
I did it again....GOAL!!!
I took a video of a gentleman who thought he was a great dancer, this is what most of you look like so take heed the next time you feel the need to start a break out dance number:
It’s not as though the leak were radioactive.
For even as he loves the arrow that flies, so He loves the bow that is stable.
I mean goodness, no teatime? That's just uncivilized.
Social workers agreed to rehouse the teenager but two days later he disappeared.
And it's yummy. It's definitely a winter dish, it's not something that makes a lot of sense to eat with a heat index of 110.
But with the hardening of religious attitudes that inevitably resulted, Stoicism began to snowball, almost in a kind of ideological feedback loop. For what made is so difficult to displace as an attitude was the fact that it was seen to be quintessentially noble, honourable--male--and no self-respecting sixteenth-century man who called himself a man would beg to differ, as is affirmed in an emblem from Henry Peacham's Minverva Britannica (1612): Amid the waves, a mightie Rock doth stand,
In the later half of the thirties in school, I learned to use an ink pen by dipping it into an ink well on each desk and then write on the paper, re-dipping it frequently. Fountain pens came in the forties where you filled the pen from an ink bottle and wrote with it until it ran out and you had to refill it. Then in the early fifties ball point pens were developed.
"She just doesn't look good, you know?"
Sweet times call for sweet desserts. Unfortunately for Son, most desserts are a no go for him. And even when I tried to make him dairy free ice cream, he asked me to heat it up in the microwave because he said it was "too cold." Son has an aversion to cold foods it seems, so I decided to go a different route and make a warm dessert. Apple crisp popped into my mind, and I thought it would be pretty easy to create one that was dairy free with the use of coconut oil.
I am grateful she is here -- at this very time of the season.. to enjoy those trees outside of her window.
Asters
Pictures when I return to NYC, which is in, countdown, three days!
But Paris is more than just a place with for gluttons. Everyday Milos and I stumbled on something new and gorgeous. We found grand churches, lush trees lined up in the enormous and oh so magnificent Jardin des Tuileries.
Robertson never duplicated his feat and developed arm trouble that plagued him the rest of his career. Charlie's accomplishment that day would be the last perfect game in the majors until Game 5 of the 1956 World Series.
in the fibers on the floor of your
She came in at 36 3/4 inches. Just about 33rd percentile.
- We reserve the right to delete any links that do not follow the challenge rules
He turns the key. Another chapter in Dublin’s history comes to an end.
Jongleur Skills: In Ara, Jongleurs use the 2d6 Bardery skill system based upon Dyson Logos' 2d6 Thievery mechanic. In addition to the three standard Bard skills -- Charm Person / Monster, Legend Lore, and Read Languages / Arcane Scrolls -- Jongleurs get one additional skill, Weapons Display, plus a special ability (no skill roll required) called Multiple Object Throwing. Like standard Bards, Jongleurs only get ONE "Favored Skill" -- all other skills roll on the "Other Skills" column on the Table below.
Phil: This is Phil.
1199 **D-XII/16/1994. Suggestion to the Federal Bureau of Investigation on the Unabomber. (Incorporated in Item C-1999(16), above, pp. 491-93, n. 365.)
The Plan wasn't entirely abandoned during our trip - we picked up locally-produced foods at a couple of farmer's markets, co-ops and even a goat dairy, not to mention a variety of products that I brought home as edible souvenirs. So, I hope you'll join me in the next few weeks as I revisit some of the more memorable food adventures of our Wild West wanderings. Coming up first: North Platte Noodles, a roadtrip dinner do-over.
I’ve never been a ”noodle”-girl, actually, to put it quite frankly: I hate noodles.
Berry: “Are you peeing and pooing?”
Tonight my two-year-old son chased me through the house. Sometimes I’d hide just around a corner, and I see him cautiously and expectantly peek to catch a glimpse of daddy. At times he was almost breathless, because he knew I was there, but he didn’t know exactly what it would be like when he found me.
2) Languages
3. Watch that diet
and that the fracturing
PKR is hobbled by poor quality assemblymen, some of whom cannot speak Bahasa Malaysia. One of them is reportedly a medium who goes into trances. He was appointed a State exco member before the pressure to perform caused him to quit.
This year, I want to become a better cook. And I want to start cooking more in general. This last year I have felt quite guilty that I didn't cook more for my family. And when I did cook, I don't think my food was all that great. So I want to change that. I want my family to crave the meals I prepare and have "favorites"! Wouldn't that be something?! I have plenty of cookbooks, tools and equipment, and lots of recorded food shows on t.v., I just need to decide what I'm going to cook and try new things.
Recently, my colleague and I have had some funny moments in the office. She is from Taiwan and has been in the US now for about 5 months. The funny moments usually happen at the end of the day when we are tired, cranky, and sometimes mentally weary. There is something about exhaustion that makes every little mishap seems that much funnier, every misunderstanding that much more laughable.
The Fantome pours a hazy golden, effervescent, with a frothy white head. A nice lace is produced as the glass is drained, and on the second pour (I was drinking a 750ml bottle), sediment from the bottom of the bottle adds to the haze.
1. Place chicken in a baking dish, skin side up. Place one slice of lemon and one clove of garlic on the top of each piece. Sprinkle with rosemary and salt and pepper. Drizzle everything with the lemon juice and olive oil.
1/2 medium red onion, chopped
stickles - stardust
“If WP only thinks of its own party interests in previous GE as well as next GE, NSP should also think of its own interests as well. Testing out the possible outcome of 3 corner fight by using Hougang by-election as testing platform is the only way for it to make proper assessment.”
The boys were scheduled for surgery at the local children's hospital, but I still didn't have a clear picture of exactly what was going to happen. Afterwards, I decided to put a few pictures of the procedure on my blog in case other parents wanted to get an idea of what happens when a child has tuberculate supernumerary teeth.
Anyone who knows how to read can read for themselves what says the holy Scriptures. And it is the Holy Spirit that teaches not sinful man.
Full of mystery, suspense, and romance, The Book of Lost Fragrances is sure to leave you longing for that favourite smell of your past, and wonder if you can find the smell to unlock hidden memories.
I want Peter and Sarah to hear this from me and not their friends, the internet or the Disney channel so I guess at some point I'm going to have to have "the talk" with them.
Zip Dry
The views of the surrounding area from the ruins were spectacular:
Apartment building common areas are no longer being heated but management tells you the fans blowing cold air in from outside is a 'feature'. Remember to wear heavy clothing while using the laundry room.
Why do I think I need
Heart attack: pain due to cardiac ischemia is more serious when a blockage in a cardiac vessel occurs as a result of the surface covering of a fatty plaque rupturing. If a blood clot (also called a thrombus) forms on the plaque, it can partially or completely block the artery of the heart and slow or block the flow of blood to the heart. If that occurs for more than 15 minutes the muscle may become damaged or cause death of that area of the heart that the blood vessel supports. During a heart attack (also called a myocardial infarction) the patient may experience a sensation of chest pain that may be a sharp, dull or burning pain that is usually located in either the middle or upper chest (possibly the left side), and sometimes this pain may radiate to the back, arms, jaw or neck. The pain may get better or worse with activity or rest and there may be other symptoms such as sweating, nausea, rapid heart rate or shortness of breath.
The Pursuit of Attention- Charles Derber (s)
About me is never true, but what can I do, who can I free
Well, frankly, it's a little anticlimactic, but hey, we might get a free Shake Weight out of it:
Instead Auster supplies yet another lesson in how anti-anti-semitism works. Cry anti-semitism! Treat the person criticizing Jews as if they are insane. A reasonable alternative—that many Jews have acted against White interests, that they have covered it up, and that others have said the same things because those things are objectively true—is apparently too far-fetched to accept.
1) I loathe being a housewife.
...Sorry, couldnt resist...
“Man, I really like Vegas.”
CD 1
But some advertisers signed up. Mr. Graves told Fortune Small Business in 2003 that Black Enterprise’s first long-term advertiser, Carter Products, wrote a check for a full year of ads before the magazine hit newsstands. Carter’s Little Liver Pills, Mr. Graves said, “were supposed to be so effective that even after you died your liver would still be flapping around and you’d have to beat it to death with a stick. In that first year we had $900,000 in ad revenues, and the magazine was profitable by its tenth issue.”
I was living with my dad and his wife at the time. I had just gotten up and was getting a bowl of cereal before work. As was the norm, the radio in the kitchen was on. As I was pouring my cereal, the radio announcer was saying that the World Trade Center had been bombed. To be completely honest, I had no idea what the World Trade Center or the Twin Towers were. I didn't have an inkling of the magnitude of what I had just heard.
Design trends reflect social, economic and political leanings and reactions. The emphasis on natural forms and semi-precious materials is a reaction to the mass market global manufacturing over the last three decades. Character, and the completely unique infuse current design direction.
The story starts with Grandma, who was and is a flamboyant, colorful figure! There were 4 children and my mother always said that my Grandmother, who had grown up the pampered only child of a Doctor, just wasn't ready for the responsibility. I never really understood what she meant by this, because she never told me.
The man unfurls with peace and power,
-olivia
Here is the main stage upstairs with the main or majority of the 3-D images hanging. It's probably hard to see but at the top of photo is a little sign that says"It's a new dimension". This show is about looking at art with the glasses you normally would be wearing at a movie !! It's pretty cool. With the glasses on certain colors will appear to be floating or hovering out from their place on the painting. Mainly the HOT colors and it seems exaggerated with the use of Thalo Blue and green. Hope some of you can make it to the show. The big celebration party is Sunday August 21, 2011 4:30 to 7 pm by invitation only and only because wine will be served.
An old geography textbook pointed our next step in this crazy line of exploration. The book Geometry by Harold R. Jacob's interested my seven year old because of its abundance of cartoons. After letting him skip around and read all the cartoons I summarized the first few chapters, which explain about Euler diagrams, equivalent statements and deductive reasoning. (I pointed out that the Euler in Euler diagrams is the same one who figured out Euler circuits.)
I´m so glad to receive new followers in my blog, to all of you I send lots of marigold.
Encouraging Exporting – to identify an organisation that best promotes exporting.
Larry Taylor and Steven Thompson on bass, Keef Hartley and Paul Lagos on drums, Don "Sugarcane" Harris on violin and Johnny Almond on saxophone and flute.
Hotel Leslie in Cliftonville had been used by local authorities around Kent for years to house homeless families. It was a doss house by any other name.
If you read it, and after giving it some thought I have changed my mind and in fact urge you to read it, please – share it. Throw it up on facebook, your blog, your twitterstream. Email it to friends. Mention it on the forums you frequent. Leave me horrified diatribes in the comments. Let me know if you like it, if you hate it, if you want more. There can be more. If you want it.
First, we have installed DirecTV from Puerto Rico. We had to buy the equipment, have it installed, and then contact DirecTV in Puerto Rico to get the signal sent to us. Kevin called the person that people in the Embassy have used to install their equipment. One morning, two guys came walking up our street, one of them carrying a big DirecTV dish on his back. They walked past our house, but looked lost. Kevin and I thought, “What are the chances that someone else in the neighborhood is installing DirecTV this week?” We figured none, so we asked the guys if they were looking for our house. They were. It’s the first time I have received installation services from two guys walking down the road carrying the dish that is going to be on our house. I wonder if they took the bus with the dish or just walked all the way.
Cap looks a tad cheesy, but his costume is impossible to film. The buccaneer boots will never work. Chris Evans seemed a bit restrained in this movie, the stiff personality of Steve Rogers maybe getting lost a smidge among all the goofballs on the team. There is not real chance for Cap to grow here. He is fully realized as a hero. But his action scenes are fantastic.
Who really wants an iconoclastic, sharp-minded 16 year old laying out cherished believes over the coal rack?
Hagara HC is down. Puts Bitter at 5/8 HC legit. That’s him on the left there in the corner of disenthusiasmism, and yes, he is indeed wearing a fishing hat. Something about a cowboy tauren just works.
Contrarily, for him to devote so much of his show's time to making the decision of which model to keep on the Wall of Morale, making the objectification of women a colossal event, was not only wrong, but a horrific departure. I was deeply, incredibly disappointed. In my eyes, another great voice failed to go "against the grain" and sold-out in the name of a pay check.
Image of: Sex scandal claims jobs of 3 Secret Service agents
Prof. Pilsner.
"Spoons! Don't you know what's spoons?"
When the hairdresser inquires "Eyebrows, sir?"
“And penicillin is not friends with germs,” said Pierre.
The Cemetery Summary Cards are arranged alphabetically by county, then by town and name of the cemetery. In addition to the cemetery name, county, and location, the Cemetery Summary Cards usually include total numbers of marked and unmarked graves, total numbers of pre- and post-1914 graves. The Cemetery Summary Cards are also available on 2 reels of microfilm: Z.3.17 — Z.3.18.
Maybe a better baker than I has a suggestion on what may have happened, or how to improve it? Maybe I should have added some milk or buttermilk or something? The batter looked good, and it wasn't burned or anything like that.
After all this time, is it possible that Saban’s feeling some heat on the recruiting trail about his roster management practices? I’m having difficulty coming up with another reason he’d talk about Taylor now.
06 It's Only A Paper Moon
But, sometimes I fail.
We will be taking a holiday break from new postings until January 2, 2012, but don’t let that stop you from going through the archives and reading the thought-provoking poetry and essays submitted by visually impaired writers and also some writers who have special relationships with visually impaired and blind people. If you are inspired by these pieces, please comment or write something of your own and submit to visionthroughwords@gmail.com (Click on the Submissions tab for more details).
And looking ahead to this year's books:
Actually, it means the best way keep your journalist buddy sweet is to help them protect their job… and this means you have to make them look busy.
But we are very excited to finally have the big day arrive. I wanted to say thanks to all of you who keep checking to see if anything new has been posted by me. I promise real soon I'll be back in the swing of things. I have a wonderful beach day to share, a homeschool convention trip to dish about and I also was going to share why I've been reading about gluten-free diets. Not to mention the new school year coming up and what I've got planned out for curriculum.
The phone a poor substitute for the feel of your embrace,
The five caravans have parked up on the Faulkland Street car park, just off the Wolverhampton Ring Road.
Today, in the light of my new reality, I can conclude that relationships when they are right, take no effort whatsoever - no matter what people say. As with anything that is alive, they will only strive if nurtured and cared for - but that is in my eyes not effort but the essence of being in love. And additionally a great deal of fun, despite some challenges.
Marvin, his wife Connie, and Yara, his guide dog, are well-known at the Aquarium. All three of them wear volunteer badges and Yara picks up pieces of paper that he sees on the floor and hands them to Marvin. He is a helper in more ways that one. Thank you Marvin, Connie, and Yara for all that you do for the community that you live in. Thank you for not allowing any obstacles to hold you back from what you love. Thank you for giving us the opportunity to see what you do behind the scenes, where most people would not even be aware that you have a disability. Thank you for being an advocate for others who have disabilities too. Without your awareness, fortitude, and advocacy, things might not be at the level that they are now. We look forward to keeping in better touch now that we have found you again. Facebook does have some advantages!!
The information and suggestions in this post are given from a personal perspective and should not be interpreted as professional medical advice. Please consult a professional Counselor, Doctor, Psychiatrist or Psychologist for help regarding depression and/or suicide.
Be happy – it seems to be good for your heart.
Well, since we are on a mini-vacation, panning for Gold in North Carolina...I better get off of the computer before hubby throws it in the creek, lol...
*Hot chicken: common in the Nashville, Tennessee area, a pan-fried variant of fried chicken coated with lard and cayenne pepper paste.
With the new year’s beginning
I have designed this book to appeal to a new and hungry kind of writer – the original storyteller, who writes for more than one medium. (Lisa Goldman)
Big Blood - Dead Songs - shit is good
Sheiner EK, Sheiner E, Hammel RD, Potashnik G, Carel R. Effect of occupational exposures on male fertility: literature review. Ind Health 2003; 41: 55-62.
I’m at mom’s today because it’s her birthday, and I asked her this question. She was quick with her answer because she well remembered the book.
(Continues with The Body Channel: The Art of Love)
So I have been majorly craving these, but also looking for a way to save a few bucks. We needed an easy meal that we can grab and run on frantic work mornings, so I decided to make a big batch of breakfast burritos and freeze them. Much to my dismay, this batch does not have green chili. I know, I know- did someone say "hypocrite"? Oh well, they are still really darn good and the next time we make green chili, I am storing away some extra just for this purpose. I just didn't have the time or energy to take on both of these projects today.
Evidently the clouds stuck around longer than expected, because our temperatures stayed in the 40s over night. Everything in the yard looked fine when we got up Wednesday morning.
How does any of that happen? Why do we have “fat” days? Why do we sabotage our own efforts? Why we doubt our own abilities, achievements, sense of purpose or attractiveness?
And snuggle them at night.
Ok, what is this book about? It's about Lawrence, a man in his late 40s and his quest for the one. After breaking up with the love of his life, Lawrence is trying to get back into "the dating game". While this game may be fun, it also has lots of rules and signals one has to decode. So, Lawrence is on a quest, trying out different dating sites and social medias to approach a normal, caring, loving woman..THE ONE! Is he going to find her?
1. This weekend I’ll be at Fuengirola a.k.a. another BEACH
Have you ever been shocked by a kind word from a stranger or an encouraging word from one who seldom encourages? Compassion comes in many shapes and sizes. In fact, it might be said that each human carries his or her own brand of compassion.
Astronomers have discovered the biggest black holes ever, not attached to a Kardashian.
help me.
I am simply, deeply grateful for this life of mine.
He lived without a face.
Very soon dawn will break and I shall hear my morning chorus of birdsong, a piece of magic!
Grainger street is the central street in what is known as Grainger Town, the historic heart of Newcastle upon Tyne, England.
Jerome: Wherein He calls the Apostles to breaking of bread, that the greatness of the miracle might be more evident by their testimony that they had none.
Taub: So, you’re worried about what it means?
11:43: Conference reconvenes with a short address from Gawain Towler, UKIP Press Officer.
Keep your habits positive because your habits become your values.
The 18 year old has already departed with the boyfriend and his family. The 14 year old is with my visiting sister, her husband and their daughter, along with my youngest sister's 8 year old daughter (yes, it's true -- my mother had only sisters, 2, I had only sisters, 3, I have only girls, 4, and both of my sisters with children only have girls -- our 4 yr old grandson is the only boy in the family aside from spouses!) riding the trolleys downtown, checking out the ducks in the fountain at the Peabody along with the decorations, and seeing Sun Studio if it's open. I guess since niece Katie took up residence in London, she's decided she needs to see Sun Studio.
“That sort of nonsense” is Jónas’s apparent mastery of dark arts, his reputation as an exorcist and healing skills that are rooted in the folklore of his country and pagan rites.
Let me know if the red lipstick on me is FAB or FUG!!!
5-6 cups of finely chopped apple pieces ( I used 7 small empire apples!)
a word that takes time defoliation
There are seats and quiet corners here. Did not take pictures then because people were seated there and did not seem nice to intrude.
If there are no serious injuries resulting from the accident, the police may not come to the scene or create their own report. If there is no official police report filed, file an accident report with the state police or your local police station to aid in claims processing.
1: Minstrel Wind
Favorite Quote: N/A
Schools continue to go without teachers and basic supplies such as textbooks, paper to write on or even desks. Many cannot even afford the uniform required for them to attend school.
I’m not necessarily wrong about his guidance but I find it difficult sometimes to wait on his timing.
Places we’re going and people we’re seeing…this week was a little slow. Mostly just sports practices and games. But it was what we needed after two week of full blast madness.
In the interests of regularity I have to proclaim that I have no axe to grind with anyone whatsoever who follows the teachings of the Catholic Church, each to his own and all that, however when a former presidential candidate (Mike Huckabee) espouses rhetoric along the lines of "We are all Catholics now" in reference to this issue – I have to say - Seriously ? lol .
Dance of You.
We didn't get just frames.
Kobe Ball
Elle will get to go see her Tia and Uncle CB because the equestrian center is just a few miles from their house. She will get to impress them with her silly songs, crazy attitude, and passion for...yelling! She has kept me in stitches lately with her fairwells to her classmates. A sweet little Colby always yells at her when we leave saying "Hey, Elle." (Say that with some attitude...heeeeey Elllllee) When we turn around, she gives her an air kiss with her hand...Elle gives one back...then they run and hug each other. So dramatic! We do the same thing with Ava in the morning. Big hugs and run off hand in hand to the PE room. Silly girls!
Now I’ll put it up against one of the beliefs that I considered around about the time I began this blog:
Once I got to my family, they gathered around me. My parents held my hands, even though I couldn’t make out their faces, I just knew it was them. I started to cry. ( I couldn’t see my face in the dream, I knew I cried because I woke up with tears on my face.) In the dream I could see a little countdown clock. It started with ten and the closer it got to one the more I was having breathing. I had just enough time to choke out my goodbyes. Then the dream faded out and I woke up.
So, busy, but a good kind of busy.
Popping a wheelie just meant pulling the front wheel off the ground for a moment, but riding a wheelie was the measure of the kid. Alfred Dickerson could ride a wheelie all day long, as if riding on one wheel was God's plan. He pedaled down the road holding the front wheel aloft, pointing it left, then right, with a level of nonchalance that rubbed salt into the wound of my incompetence. The first time I saw Alfred do this, I was in awe. I felt I couldn't go on. And when I thought he couldn't be any cooler, he let go of the handlebars.
There are two questions that are important to me …
Sexy Maria’s subliminal “phallic” map: an innocent mistake? Perhaps. Or, perhaps, not.
we've established
20 weeks! we find out the sex!!
Coulport, once a high falutin' resort for Victorian Glaswegians who fancied a wee jaunt doon ra watter, once housed the Kibble Palace, the beautiful giant greenhouse in the West end's Botanic Gardens. Since 1963 and the aftermath of the Cuban missile crisis, it's been home to the UK's Polaris and then Trident nuclear warheads. It's a mere thirty miles from our largest population in Glasgow. West of Glasgow we also have the former RNAD Beith, now known as DM Beith, the DM stands for Defence Munitions, it's also long been known as the largest arms dump in Western Europe. Today it processes and stores Brimstone, Spearfish, Storm Shadow and Tomahawk missiles. If it went up, there'd be an almighty hole called Kilmarnock Bay. A friend who lived in Barrmill used to speak about the train drivers using the exclusive munitions rail line, stopping the train at the bridge and getting out for a walk up to the wee shop for their paper and a Mars bar, leaving said weapons laden train unattended...
I've been trying to be strict with Weight Watchers again but have struggled. They dropped the daily points again and I am struggling to feel satisfied. I find myself constantly grazing, looking for something to eat. One thing I have been doing recently is making a protein smoothie for breakfast, and maybe for another meal later in the day. I have perfected my recipe and look forward to drinking it every day. BUT, again, I don't feel like it sticks with me! I have been using the EAS Lean 15 protein powder...low in calories and sugar. It is good but just doesn't satisfy me. So, I have been on the lookout for what to do next. My miles are gradually increasing so I find myself hungrier. This is only going to get worse.
That loosened our laughter. But everyone was mute. I think my cousin shared a few things, but it was time to move on.
4. Follow my blog and tell me (or tell me if you already are).
1/2 cup of your favorite spicy barbecue sauce
Just scroll down to the bottom of the thumbnails, enter your site information and you're ready!
i met zaida 3 weeks after her fathers beatings and from her head to her toes there where scars from how he had abused her. it took a lot of control for me not to cry as she shared her story. my heart just quietly bled.
What a beautiful Pussy you are,
Mark 10:45
My kids do not have that need, they have never had teaching, lessons, curriculum and tests.They are incredibly knowledgeable about various things. I could not have begun to teach them what they know. They have truly learned so much in their own way and time. It's their life and mind and nobody should control that but them.
Adani drained the glass once more and stood up. “I cannot help you,” he said. “It was my brother who held the maps. My brother knew the way. I only followed. I cannot show you the way through the desert. I will not show you the way.”
Just relax, calm down. He’s trying so hard to make up for being such a jerk. You didn’t want to get on the bike and that ended okay. What’s wrong with one glass of Champagne? He just said girlfriend … you’re his girlfriend. Just one glass, it’s only champagne.
Are you dreading the slog through mall and mayhem with the accompanying auditory torture of repetitious holiday music?
The perverse soul which takes its joy in this passing hour has here its day. Here it finds the things that content it; for a while it takes its joy in earthly things, for a while it takes it is puffed up with vanity, for a while it grows feeble through bodily pleasures, and then when it has lost its fear of the judgment to come, it has peace in its own day: to find it a grave stone of stumbling on that other day of its damnation. For there it shall be afflicted, while the just rejoice; all the things that are now for its peace, will then be changed into bitterness of contention: for it will begin to rage within itself, for having closed its eyes from seeing the evils to come. For this reason He says to it: but now they are hidden from thine eyes. For the perverse soul that is given over to temporal things, and weakened by bodily pleasures, blinds itself to the evils that pursue it; for it turns from looking ahead at things to come, lest they trouble its present delight. And in abandoning itself to the allurements of this life, what else is it doing but hurrying with closed eyes towards the everlasting fire?
I also bought another pair of socks and some sole inserts that support my very high arch. (Another reason I suffer shin splints…)
As I am washed into the overflow
I used two cans of coconut milk, quarter cup fish sauce, 2-3 tablespoons of besan (mixed in water), some more water, sugar and salt to make my soup. It takes about 15-20 minutes of temperature-controlled cooking to finish making the soup.
Take the bread out and spread a thin layer of cream cheese and a thin layer of farmhouse chutney on the bread. Once the egg is done, add it to the toast as well. Top with two slices of bacon and give the rest to your family (SMILE--they'll thank you for the treat)! Then scoop up the arugula and plop on the bacon.
The journey to success is never easy no matter the route you take and one has to be of a very strong character to persevere. I always say failure is just a challenge but giving up is for the weak.
GLVKZ Blog (glvkzblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
There are no rejections. If your query is not posted within about 120 days, it probably won't be.
1) Make a paste of tomato and keep it aside.
"Learn from me...gentle...humble...rest." These words of Jesus pointed me to Peter's words to women in I Peter 3:3-6:
I watched the video -- to be honest, I may have watched it more than once. Brooklyn's part was OK, I guess -- if you're into that sort of thing -- but what grabbed my attention was the music.
I don’t actually know how to do any of that.
Want to see what a real hero of the working class looks like? This is Jack Balestreri (below), the last living person who worked on building the Golden Gate Bridge, the construction of which cost 11 lives. Balestreri passed away last week at the age of 95. The Occupy movement had plans to shut the bridge down yesterday, in protest of something or other, but decided against it at the specific request of the Bridge’s union workers, preserving, for the moment, the work and sacrifice of real working people, like Jack Balestreri.
Notice the progression. Leaving a straight five year plan may be a bit overwhelming, so we included a one and three year plan to act as a checkpoint of sorts to get you to the eventual five year plan. It makes the journey more attainable and allows you to really mark the path you are on.
Here’s a good picture of Red Square (the one at the top is St. Basil’s Cathedral):
“Mom,” he says.
“Only 20 years ago, when my wife and I decided to move to Bangalore from Bombay, we could visit a new suburb, buy a site of our choice, and then sit down with an architect to design the house we wanted. No more.
The stark assessment of the current global outlook by the group, who
This procedure combines both diagnosis and treatment for ovarian cancer because the tumor is often completely removed at this time. A piece of the tissue that is removed will be examined under a microscope to determine whether the tumor was benign or malignant.
Night passed and morning came. That was the second day. No hangover again. I was no defying science.
He not only needed her to help him physically at times, but depended on her totally for her company. She could not interest him in watching anything on TV if she did not sit there and watch with him. He had lost the capacity to sit and read due to his memory issues (could not keep up with the plot and the characters in a story) so that option was out; and he did not latch on to books-on-tape (maybe to new fangled for him, I don’t know). Suffice it to say that she was his world and her world was shrinking because of his care needs.
As she drove away, laughter in her voice: “Piker.”
If you couldn't guess by the cover, the St. Petersburg quintet takes on a very futurist, dystopian aesthetic to the lyrics and visuals that is a great match to their mechanistic bombast. But while they're not averse to incorporate synthesizers and industrial noises from time to time, the backbone here is in the sheer weight of performance. The drums are enormous, the bass plugs along like a feed belt in some factory and the guitars are generally very muscular in and out of their chugging and grooving. The vocals of Oleg Sobolevskiy are a little difficult to pin down, think of heavier early 90s Max Cavalera dowsed in brutal gutturals for most of the heavier sequences, and yet where the band clears for a brooding, darker progressive passage he also takes on this unnerving, eerie aural hue which is near Gothic in delivery. When I referenced Meshuggah earlier, that wasn't to say that Stalwart are some generic djent wannabe, but they have a similar sense for the thick rhythmic grooves that course below the atmospheric dressings like oily blood en route to a rusted, metallic aorta.
R stands for how recently it (the purchase) happened. F is how frequently they come around to do it (the purchase) again. And M is for how much money they spend. Would you date a person with a low RFM score? He don’t call. He don’t write. He don’t pay. She only texts at 2 a.m. on some Saturdays. A keeper? Not so much, this one.
Even in victory it’s worth noting it was a shitty victory and you should feel bad for encouraging him.
In 2010, there were 49 new posts, not bad for the first year! There were 57 pictures uploaded, taking up a total of 42mb. That’s about 1 pictures per week.
7. The Bourne Legacy
"Oh, there's no sound??"
In the case of obvious conditions, a person being victimized has the opportunity to take sufficient measures as to avoid harm. And this is commonly pointed to by medicos as a way of saying emotions are your responsibility alone and don’t blame anyone else no matter what they do. It is never stated in that many words but essentially that is what is being said. The reality however is that the obvious forms are not all that there is. ESP is a reality and inside of relationship it is at a premium. Thus to pose danger or point at doing some injustice, the offenders do not need to approach the person they target. In many cases even with a loaded gun they do not need to have “line of sight”. They do not even need to be in the same place exactly. However to have an affect they do need relationship and a high level of insightfulness that is borne out of relationship, even trivial relationship generates some small measure of result that is well above the situation where people are unrelated and have never met. ESP or psi (Insightfulness within relationship) can be greatly increased when a person is placed under fear conditions. And YES, even here a person can be in control, sufficiently as to avoid harm BUT they need to be knowledgeable about the foul play AND they need to fully appreciate the medical misinformation and be able to confidently discard it. And finally real handling of the situation can only be achieved by a non-toxic person as to escape harm and I will discuss that later.
Oh and guess what?! Max is sleeping SO MUCH BETTER. He also rolled onto his tummy last night for the first time!
I first became aware of Jim Garrow's story in March 2008, after an article was published in a Canadian magazine giving the basic elements of his story. In June 2008, I decided to speak to the man personally and called him at his home in Ontario and asked him to go into the details of his work in more depth. My intent was to publish the interviews in June 2008, but I was asked to hold off, because there was a Canadian investigation into Garrow's claims of infant smuggling, and did not wish him to become cautious. I finally decided to post the interviews to my blog after the GuelphMercury article was published in August 2010 confirming the investigation. One can listen to our Garrow interviews here.
I wondered, was it a bird that I didn’t see?
Boys (Luther Dixon, Wes Farrell)
Because I am flying home with the team in the morning, and I’m in the lineup at the Clay Way event, I didn’t have time to get to all of the links. Here’s what I could get late on Friday night:
Cover with foil, and bake one hour.
A recent survey by FishNet Security found that information security officials are becoming increasingly concerned about the privacy and security risks of mobile cloud computing.
Throughout the day my boys go through so many ranges of emotion. They laugh, cry, leap for joy and do it all over again. They express their likes and dislikes and do not stiffle their emotions. They lay it all on the line whether we like it or not. If Aiden is hungry and wants a PB& J he doesn't care if we have a to-do list a mile long. His hunger doesn't have a pause button. If Ehric has something to say or if he is curious about something he is going to ask. If only we were all so intune to ourselves the way children are...what a different world would we live in.
What’s the difference? Glad you asked.
MB: I've spanked the hecklers in front with a giant rubber weiner.. thrown water or beer on the mouthy ones
Hopefully they will be dry enough to paint on when Roarke has gone to bed and I can get emotional!
Tell 11 things about yourself, answer the 11 questions asked by the one that tagged you, tag 11 other people and ask them 11 different questions.
The question then arises, for me: What the fuck is BC doing at ILuvSA? Not that I have a problem with you being there at all! Perhaps you are open to alternative ideas and opinions; perhaps you have not completely made up your mind? Perhaps you are simply at ILuvSA, cause you consider us a bunch of ignorant racist pricks that need to be converted, and you are there to convert us. Whatever your intentions are, I don't have a problem with any of the aforementioned intentions or a combination thereof.
Also, no "cultural memory of genocide" prevented the Israeli government from attempting to enact an Infiltration Prevention Bill which called for the jailing for up to five years of all people illegally entering the country, including asylum-seekers. The bill was pulled after it was pointed out by human rights organizations that it constituted a blatant violation of Israel's commitments as a signatory of the 1951 UN Convention Relating to the Status of Refugees.
Somewhere in those archives, there’s still a couple of stories with my by-line. You’d have to look incredibly hard to find them, but they’re there. One was, I think, something to do with Terry Griffiths (who I still remember to this day as the man who kept a stack of signed photographs in the boot of his car) and one was vaguely connected to a rest home of some description. I think. Maybe. As you can see, my knack for recalling detail and my razor-sharp insight would have made me a spectacular investigative journalist.
my glorious.
Thing is, if I hadn’t been so hyper about it, I probably would have been absolutely content with the day in the first place. It was low-key, relaxed, no pressures. Filled with stuff I love (books, friends, naps, food, coffee, walks, time in my garden, laughing until I cry). A rare occurrence during this busy wedding season.
Once upon a time members never entered the social rooms of the other club, but this bitterness has been broken down and turned into a friendly rivalry off the field in recent years. There is an evident “love-to-hate” relationship between the cross-road rivals. This is ultimately one of the most unique rivalries in country football and netball, that has developed into a special relationship.
Labour MPs say the decision to seek accommodation outside London is proof that the government's policy of capping housing benefit is already "beginning to unravel".
I sent the inspiration image to Paul (sister's new husband) and he created this fun sign. We used some thin twine/rope and hung it over a post on the deck pointing in the direction of the beach where the ceremony was held.
This is David, another volunteer. He has designated himself "box boy." He not only brings in new boxes but helps us keep the filled, sealed, boxes organized.
when we will be face to face
The problem with this sequel is that its story is a muddled mess. This was something that never happened with the original. No matter how crazy things got in the original film, the story always made sense, everything eventually falls into plays with the first Hellraiser film. Not so with this sequel. The films main premise is that Kristy is willing to go back to hell to rescue her father from the clutches of the Cenobytes, but unfortunately, the film never really follows that idea to its completion and it disintegrates into something else entirely. Suddenly the film is about Dr. Channards desires to go to hell and become a powerful Cenobyte himself. Suddenly, the film is a stand off between Dr. Channard and Pinhead, battling over who gets to “take over this operation”. So in the beginning, apparently the film is about Kristy rescuing her dad, and then in its second half, it turns into something else entirely. It does get kind of confusing at times.
-Steve
A Gifted Man
A bit of a job, but so well worth it. After squid has defrosted, clean the entire inside body, by pulling out the little plastic part that is inside, and dispose of it. Also, save the tentacles, try not to rip them...leaving it intact.
Her first book, An Alpha’s Path, is the first in her Redwood Pack series. She’s also an avid reader and lover of romance and fiction novels. She loves meeting new authors and new worlds. Any recommendations you have are appreciated. Carrie Ann lives in New England with her husband and two kittens.
Interactive Discussion: to buy or not to buy - the value of making and collecting studio ceramics in the 21st century
I find naming one of the most joyous aspects of creating characters and often their entire personality will hinge on their name. I am like a blackbird, foraging for names all the time: in newspapers, in TV credits, in spam etc. My husband brought home a new cookbook the other night and the author’s name was so quirky and cute, I’ve stolen it for my list of character names. I like odd and memorable names. I love the way Dickens used names in his fiction, and Annie Proulx is a consummate namer.
This book is a must read for every parent! It will not only help you to determine what language each of your children speaks, it will also give you practical suggestions for creating a sense of security for them.
DB2 for z/OS query CPU parallelism (hereinafter referred to simply as "query parallelism"), introduced with DB2 Version 4 in the mid-1990s, enables DB2 to split a query into multiple tasks that can execute concurrently on a mainframe server. The primary benefit of query parallelism is improved performance from an elapsed time perspective (query parallelism tends to increase statement execution CPU time somewhat -- this because DB2 needs to evaluate a candidate statement to determine whether or not parallelism would improve the query's run time, and because DB2 has to manage a parallelized query's "child" tasks). That said, for locally-originating queries (i.e., those issued by programs running on the mainframe server on which the target DB2 subsystem is running), a sometimes equally-appealing benefit is redirection of work to the server's zIIP engines, if the server is configured with zIIPs (queries that come from remote DRDA requesters, processed through DB2's distributed data facility, already benefit, cost-wise, from substantial zIIP offload).
In the same way, in order to make the best use of the material and circumstances I come in contact with each day, I have to train my mind so that it keeps more of the good stuff and less of the bad. I need Aerobic exercises – time with my Heavenly Father and in His word and Resistance exercises – time with others both in fellowship and service.
Her mom was sitting wrapped in a blanket on the chair in the front of the fireplace.
This was, for many years the headquarters of recruitment for obligatory military service. Here was where they was passed the first medical examination. Here they are weighed you, measured you.
"Vale Decem" (Pronounced Val- eh dee-Chem) is the song played during David Tennants regeneration scene. It translates as "Farewell Ten" from Latin. :( Sad.
*Speaking of discipline. We have a crazy man on our hands. :) This past month has been rough I tell ya! Toddler phase isn't going to be my favorite. I love that his personality is shining, but now is when he set the rules in our home. He understands fully when we say No. Now, if we say no, he manages to sprawl himself belly down on the floor and throw a fit. This is when I walk away. Silly boy.
Other - Glitz Alphabet Stickers, American Crafts Thickers, 1 1/4" Circle Punch, EK Success Scallop border punch
Patientia (Arctic Brewing). Oak-aged sour beer showcasing distinct notes of caramelized pineapple produced by Brettanomyces. Brewer, John Dunfee.
The American Roman Catholic Church engages in a Hispanization scheme on a scale undreamed of by the most committed apparatchiks of the Hispanic section of ADL — ostensibly an organization existing to combat anti-Semitic defamation. The scale of the subversion in just one diocese, Cardinal Mahony’s Los Angeles, may be glimpsed here and here. It’s no different in any other American city, e.g. Chicago or Washington. And the activism is not just on immigration issues, what with Catholic phenomena such as Dorothy Day’s Catholic Worker Movement or Father Pfleger’s antics in Chicago.
Digi image Honey from Saturated Canary
Richard Fernandez has a thought-provoking take on how the blogosphere works, including the various categories of Finders, Linkers, and Thinkers, and the roles they play.
~ Walt Whitman, 1819-1892
Peek into a very organized kitchen!
I took a walk to Sunflower for our produce and tired out about a quarter of the way there. Grrrr. Maybe not as good as I thought. I came back and took these pictures of my neighbor across the way planter. Looks so much prettier than mine which is full of mud from the pipe leak by my window and cigarette butts from the people above me.
There was mixed reaction to the Atheist Agenda's anti-Bible effort. While some disagreed fervently, many still felt as though it was the students' right to hold an event based on their beliefs (or lack thereof). Nearby, members of the school's Victory and Praise Choir sang worship songs and prayed in an effort to make their presence - and stance against the event - known.
I am so thrilled when you leave a comment and I try always to reply
e. all of the above.
I do not dread falling in love for I claim that – to love, and to be loved in return are two of the greatest experiences a human can encounter. However, I dread what a short-lived love with much beautiful possibilities of growth, can do.
Today’s feast is grated Broccoli and Carrot.
Preheat oven to 425 degrees F. Position the oven rack in the lower third of the oven. Butter a 1 1/2 quart souffle dish or six 1 cup (8 ounce) ramekins and dust bottom and sides with Parmesan cheese.
In West Texas, the main source of water is rain, which, Pfeifer noted, comes from heaven.
Mexico’s defense secretary has conceded errors in the country’s drug war, in one of the more frank assertions from the government as it wages a military-led campaign against violent traffickers.
I went to sleep last nite feeling pretty good but it didn’t last. I started waking up numerous times throughout the night. I’d wake up breathing real hard ... trying to get some air in me. D described it as I start breathing shallow then I take a whole bunch of deep breaths to recover. He says I moan a little in there too.
He sang in his dialect, of his land and of its people.
The 2012 NFL Draft finally arrived Thursday night. Round one wrapped up at Radio City Music Hall in New York. It was first night of a three day selection extravaganza. Millions of fans will tune-in to get a glimpse of their team’s future. Take me for instance, I’m a diehard, lifelong Miami Dolphins fan. The future is all I have, because typically the present is usually quite unattractive. The annual draft is the equivalent of the playoffs for a team like mine. It just comes with the added bonus of knowing that they won’t get beat 62-7. (That was the final score of Dan Marino’s last game, a playoff debacle in Jacksonville. It was so bad that it was also head coach Jimmy Johnson’s last game. The loss was so horrific that nothing Johnson would do after that could ever be more embarrasing. That’s why it was so easy for him to transition into his roll as an Extenze spokesperson. I know I have to let it go, but like any true fan, I cannot.) The bottom line is that optimism reigns supreme on a night like this. Past losses and past failures take a back seat for a brief three day stretch.
It's that time of year when people are begging their friends and family to take excess zucchini off their hands. Zucchini is far more versatile than people realize and has many more uses than the old stand-by of zucchini bread!Nutritionally, zucchini is a great source of fiber and has significant amounts of calcium, magnesium, potassium,Vitamin A, lutein, Vitamin C ... and is a fair source of Omega 3 fatty acids!
Cardstock: Blushing Bride, Pear Pizzazz, Marina Mist, Perfectly Plum, Whisper White, Nursery Nest DSP.
The most ardent Bitterenders were from the Orange Free State.
David had four bids out for great projects. His company had finished another project and was waiting for the final approval from his client. The phone was not ringing. His email and phone calls were not being returned. Most of all he was not hearing from his best client. This was a scary place to be so he called me to ask what was going on.
This treasured friendship of ours was set afire
And though I dearly love all of the wondrous gadgets that blink and ring . . . the almost aggressively casual work environment that helps to spur that creativity - has set an incredibly 'low bar' for ones personal appearance. A fact which has always troubled me.
250ml skimmed milk
*Complimentary Beginning and Intermediate Lindy Lesson 7:30-8:15
She took me in and gave me breakfast
In a word: complicity. On a massive scale. Because in some places, most people say, You know what? Yes. Yes I would like a receipt with that. Places like Singapore, for example. Or Finland. Or Australia.
Today, pushing a trolley up and down the aisles at Asda, I was encouraged several times to buy the autobiographies of James Corden and Rob Brydon. They were both addressing me, the customer, directly. James said his book was only £9. Imagine the value in that! James and Rob were speaking between the Christmas songs. Rob did his little man in a box voice which always cracks me up. It sounds like a tiny little man speaking from inside a box.
The bottom line is find the marketing tools that work best for your program and implement them to keep alumni engaged and willing to assist their alma mater.
You’ll have no problem following the story, as the plot isn’t all that complex. We know that it is the contents of two safes that everyone wants, needs, or is willing to die to protect.
Madame Tussauds
But the big winners who give us hope for the future of Europe, are the Freedom Party who will have increased their number of parliamentary seats to 35, up from 21 and the Alliance for the Future of Austria which will now have 21 seats as opposed to the 7 seats they started the campaign with.
I am knitting like a demon on D's jumper and fantasising about machine knitting. It's hard to find the big chunks of time you really need to progress machine knit projects. I keep thinking about all the ways that machine knitting is so very different to the hand variety. I'm definitely glad to have both but it can be frustrating to deal with the drawbacks of one over the other.
Gig Economy / Age of Gigonomics – Some writers are describing the current job market in this way
Rhyme – Rhyming picture book are very, very hard to pull off. And they are limiting, because the writer is constrained to tell their story within a certain framework. I frequently ask writers if their story truly needs to be told in rhyme. If not, then don’t.
Koch said, “Wait a minute boys, here’s our thoroughbred!”
I had tea in silence and let my mind wander.
The Upsetters - Walk The Streets
there were times she was a woman,
Want to know something cool? I forgot to subtract one minute off my WOD time yesterday (since I started with 1:00 on the timer). That boosted my ego a bit yesterday as I remembered it! Yesterday’s brutality, I mean WOD, consisted of:
Go in peace, glorifying the Lord by your life.
Call your local Limbaugh outlet, ask if they endorse terrorism, too. If they don’t endorse terrorism, ask what they intend to say and do about Limbaugh.
-Elizabeth
Plus this trifle.
And the prosecutors who put innocent people away by knowingly suppressing evidence that could help them out (in violation of law!)??? They don't lose their jobs or face any substantive punishment. One guy had to take a 1-day ethics course. Whoop de do.
Mike kept asking my what my favorite part was. Usually that's a pretty simple question for me to answer, but under these circumstances I just couldn't. Everything about it was amazing. From all of our cool conversations with fellow tourists and locals (I loved hearing many of their stories of how they decided to sell everything on the mainland and buy a one way ticket), to learning about the culture and plants, to hiking, rafting, snorkeling, and helicopter rides. Everyone there is in a good mood so it was so much fun to stir up a conversation with random people. It was definitely everything I ever imagined Hawaii to be, and more. Christian, one of our tour guides said it best. "We have no poison oak, no poison ivy, no snakes. It truly is paradise." Indeed it is.
Three iconic American women in the post-war era were transformed by their year of study in Paris, and went on to transform American life.
I love to see them worn by those suited for BOLD stripes-those BOLD HORIZONTAL STRIPES.
No to her. She knew something about sewing and had prepared the t-shirts,
when still within this days wild blur
Case in point. The glamorous life of a travel writer. If you love to travel and, you know, you write for a living (or think you should) well, what could be better? Sigh. If only. But, as Pam (AKA “Nerd’s Eye View) writes in a post entitled “Why I’m not a full-time Travel Writer”, once you’re on the inside, you realize that the reality is quite different from the fantasy. She’s a travel writer, who pays the bills as a technical writer, and she provides a dose of reality as to what that dream career is really like. The whole post is great, but here’s the nut:
"The lofty status of universities is an indicator of a lack of status for any other alternative for post-school education," said Frances Faller, an education expert at the University of Witwatersrand in Johannesburg.
leads back to you, the light as it came upon us
A holiday is the perfect opportunity to try new things, such as taste different foods and experience the culture. Quad biking across the Sinai Desert is an extreme example, but you can become open to new ideas and suggestions in your everyday life too. Before you immediately say no to an idea or an invitation to try something new, give it a chance and you may even surprise yourself that you enjoyed the experience. Ask yourself, what is the worst that can happen?
13. The book " So Many Days". Another gift from our very favorite book lady, Mrs. Fig. If I couldn't own that darling store, I am so happy it belongs to her. Zoey is mesmerized by all books and she too loves our nightly book reading sessions. In fact, there have been evenings that she has been so tired and I try to jammie her and turn on her music to just get her settled for bed and she, without fail, signs 'book'. How could I ever say no to that?
What seemed a monotonous breadth of violent green from 3,000 feet reveals itself to be anything but. It’s an untamed place, resplendent with the rich details that we pilots often miss from our bird’s-eye view. Drifting silently through this tunnel of foliage, surrounded by hundreds of square miles of swamp you could lose yourself in for years, you suddenly realize that the Earth is, in fact, very big. It’s easy to forget this when you routinely survey the planet from thousands of feet above it, clipping off miles much faster than the average mortal.
Amount Requested $26,558
They were all gathered outside the exit and I kind of hovered on the periphery until Regis noticed me. We made eye contact and I kind of dove in, hand extend. "Mr. Philbin, I'm a big fan. Especially when I see you on Letterman."
ISBN: 006440630XRecommended for: young adults ages 12-18, adults too love this book-a quick read
I gave it a break then grabbed this lemoney joint. Of course the dude put a durn lemon in it, so it will bias the palette a bit. This puppy was translucent, cloudy, and deep tan (as a good hefe can be). A white head to cap 'er off. I found this one to be thin, nice light body, with high carbonation and high acidity. I'm a little bigger fan of the witbiers than hefe's, but it was a nice change of pace.
I got my first glasses when I was in year 12 at school. My first set were pale pink plastic and they were ENORMOUS on my face. Well, come on, it was the 80s. From there I went all gold and very Dynasty looking before then getting my first set of tortoise shell frames with (again) as much gold as I could muster.
Tossing your rock into the first square was always quite easy, but I basically sucked after that. For example. if it was my turn to throw it in square #7, and it landed in #8, my turn would be over. And again, since I sucked at Hopscotch, I spent a lot of time sitting on the sidelines, looking at my rock.
So on the heels of what was a subpar Beijing, our women have rebounded nicely, gaining ground on the rest of the world, leading the way in Daegu, and providing a great base rounding the corner towards London. Similar improvements in 2012 from our men on the track and thirty medals in London would certainly be within reach.
6. Overture (Webber, Rice) 3:55
Tell Herman Cain and Robert Johnson that a black man cannot make it in America, and they will laugh you out of the room.
This afternoon my hubby took a nap and I got my sample ready for the color challenge on Splitcoaststampers this coming Tuesday. I also have a blog hop upcoming with Marks Finest Papers starting Tuesday. There is a chance to win some stamps so stop back on Tuesday.
Kasten wasn't seriously injured and left the scene before emergency crews arrived, Cpl. George Kantor of the FHP said. Alcohol is not believed to have been a factor in the crash.
There is no one ‘model person’ standard that we all compare ourselves to, to determine whether we are worth more or less than others. Our world is made up of billions of individuals that are all different, even if they look similar or act in a similar way. Even though we can be similar we are not the same. And if we are all not the same, we are valuable for our uniqueness.
Piper leaned across the table, his voice gentle. “A while ago, I saw you playing wiffle ball with a bunch of little kids on the corner. A couple of teenagers from 195th Street started picking on that Ralph kid. You know? The tiny kid with the big mouth. Ralph wouldn’t shut up, so they began beating him.”
It’s very important you make sure your wedding dress’ undergarments give you both the support and coverage you need. A sexy dress should expose some skin but not bare all, especially in front of your future in-laws and grandma.
Direction the sun tracks
And though there are calculations and stuff requiring mental exercise and quite of reading yet I am jumping on this. By the way anyone interested to join the bandwagon, just hop on.
3. Create mentoring and “reverse mentoring” programs- you can pair up young and senior employees to help where needed. The senior employee can share the wisdom gained from experience. In tum, the younger employee can share how to better use technology.
Sofitel Chicago
I just took the flower and attached it to a wooden dowel, wrapped in ribbon and Ta-Da. It's a Magic Wand! haha
With the Defender covered in mud to the top, we stop by a nice restaurant near Scanno. Again, we are out of season and no one is here. Since the locals know each other we all get a free beer and crackers while having an Italian gobbledygook chat. The owner shows us video footage of wolves he’s filmed right outside of the restaurant and Guido shows us a video on YouTube of bears roaming through the centre of Scanno.
Kira wants to know more about ancestors. She asks me if our ancestors are dead. I say yes, the ones who were slaves are dead, but her grandparents are also her ancestors: Grandy and Grandpa are alive, my parents are alive, Grandma and Grandpa Christensen are alive, Grandma Gill and Bapuji are alive. They are also her ancestors. She says, "But Bapuji is a boy."
Considering the trouble created by political attacks on education in state legislatures this year, much of the attacks wholly unnecessary, it’s a wonder the teachers don’t show up with pitchforks, torches, and tar and feathers.
project owners choose a deadline and a target minimum of funds to raise. if the chosen target is not gathered by the deadline, no funds are collected (this is known as a provision point mechanism). money pledged by donors is collected using Amazon Payments".
I always thought maybe one day I would start a scholarship fund for underprivileged kids like myself who struggled without having the resources that make education easy. I like seeing people succeed and be empowered, indeed it's one of the reasons I ran a side business making websites for people. I didn't like the design part as much as I liked seeing people realize their dreams. Maybe a mentorship is more important because the power of having someone believe in us is so strong? I have mentored students and even strangers (one woman recently thanked me for helping her navigate a new career path, she's doing awesome now -- that felt wonderful).
More running/less procrastinating.
Professor : You are a Christian, aren’t you, son ?
They used to use urine to tan animal skins, so families used to pee in a pot and then, once a day it was taken and sold to the tannery.
Her speech therapist has been working on vocabulary with her. To be honest, I'm not sure why. Well, not really, I do know Goldie has to understand words before she can begin to use them. But, I don't know if the ST realizes how many words Goldie knows. I had also hoped to see more oral motor activities being done. I asked for a copy of the treatment plan so I can get a better understanding of what strategies she's using and the goals they are working towards. For what its worth, I really like the ST. I've been very impressed that she has high and appropriate expectations of Goldie.
must have toe clip with return throttle. All controls are subject to
There should be some super sleazy, Delta crossroads type of account for this, fire and whiskey spewing from the stomachs of virgins or something. Maybe I'll invent one. In the meantime: Doc and I had been in the same writing group for a bit. I sent him an excerpt of my novella, By the Nails of the Warpriest, and he dug it, mentioned that he needed help reading stories, and that's pretty much it. I really should come up with a sexier story.
As I explained what Picasso was doing in his art,
28th), Marcus Du Berlais (UR 22nd); 2006 Native Upmanship (Ref 27th); 2008 King Johns Castle (2nd); 2010 King
And what it is, nobody knows.
Don't they look gross! I used the left over Manic panic dye in Pillar-box Red from when I used when I had red streaks in my hair.
As you can see I'm a collector only of my family's art, but I love to have the original works of my artist family and friends, not only because I love art, but because each one reminds me of them and how special they are.
Abridged, the poetry/art magazine is looking for submissions for its Silence issue. A maximum of 3 poems may be submitted of any length. Art can be up to A4 size and can be in any media. It should be at least 300 dpi. Submissions can be emailed to abridged@ymail.com or posted to: Abridged c/o The Verbal Arts Centre, Stable Lane and Mall Wall, Bishop Street Within, Derry BT48 6PU. Closing date for submission is Jan 14th 2012.
I am going... To go visit my daughter's this evening.My older daughter Laura has a bad back and this is causing her a great deal of pain. She will be so pleased to see me.
Oh how the Matron loves Narrator. Her little right hand man!
When it comes to finishing what I start...
it has another home
You’ve been in a number of different TV series’ and films – who have been your favourite actors/actresses to work with so far and which project has been your favourite to be a part of?
Also, I'll give you a hundred bucks cold hard cash if you can produce a 14 year old who uses the word "delved" in conversation.
After we swam, the captain anchored in a cove and served a delicious lunch of grilled calamari, grilled lamb, Greek salad, pasta with olives and tomatoes, and yogurt with cucumber -- all amazing! Everyone ate around a table on the boat, in swimsuits and towels.
—Cicero
Just before I leave you and go outside to see if there's a glimmer of the Northern lights in the sky, I will just share this picture of the rather spectacular sky seen from my boys bedroom window on Tuesday. Boy did we have some rain here! So much so, the new beds turned into ponds, and the moorhens decided it was a great new place for a swim!
So I think that is all my Christmas shopping/gift making done! YAY!
(Source: www.yvesrocher.ca)
I was on holiday away from my computer and itching to get on with an earlier writing project I’d started. Because I didn’t have that manuscript with me - or any way of accessing it - I decided to start something new. I can remember the exact day I wrote the first page of Phoebe and it’s funny because even though the book has changed so many times and in so many ways since then - that original page remained more or less unchanged (although it ended up much later on in the first chapter)
65 ***1. Notes on the First Amendment to the Constitution of the United States (University of Chicago doctoral dissertation, 1964), pp. i-viii, 1-843. (Pages 1-471 are incorporated in Item B-1, above (1971). The appendices to this dissertation include, in the following order, Items D-I/26/1963, D-II/12/1961, D-X/10/1963, D-V/5/1961, D-II/21/1964, D-III/3(B)/1963, D-VIII/26/1963, D-I/25/1959, D-IV/18(A)/1962, D-XI/14/1961, D-I/19/1961, D-III/21/1962, D-V/13/1963, D-X/1/1963, D-VIII/19/1961, D-XII/8/1967, D-VI/2/1962, and D-V/10/1964, below. All of these items have since been published elsewhere except for Items D-IV/18(A)/1962 and D-VI/2/1962, below.)
The establishment houses many antiques and artifacts and serves a wonderful fare known as Baba Nyonya cuisine by Malaysian chef John Locke. Baba Nyonya is a fusion of Chinese and Malaysian and Mr. Locke does it rather well.
4.) I can understand drunk Canadians (Gotta love family reunions up there)
When I was younger I used making tape around my stomach to "hold in my flab" ..... well all was great until I had to sit down. It ripped. Hard. And loud. Just save yourself time and embarrassment and invest in some spankx.
I think it’s quite insulting if I’m honest. The only difference between a self-published and traditionally-published book is that the traditional one has been scrutinized by several professionals in their field and past from pillar to post before appearing on the shelves. An author of a self-published novel is still an author. I do think the perception is changing because more and more self-published novels are coming onto the market. There are some incredibly talented authors out there who deserve recognition and unless they are established, well known or in the celebrity status, they find it very difficult to be taken seriously.
-picking up dog poop...weeding...things kids REALLY don't want to do...I think they'll get the point after having to pick something to do out of that jar.
here's my guy the morning of.
Here is a testimony from a good friend of mind. This testimony is to help give hope to those in need, as well as to show the importance of the impact a good friend can make on someone.
Lens Construction: 20 elements in 15 groups
prakāśante mahātmanaḥ
Though the True Blood star — who confirmed her pregnancy April 17 — has largely dressed her baby bump in black, the actress opted for quite a bit of color at a Saturday outing in Beverly Hills.
Chris Petrella (REP) 0.62% 22
If any students are thinking of applying, please do so via the placements office. If you have any questions, Jordan & Vicky (final years) both completed their placements there, so just ask!
Sort through the bead collection to locate a center-drilled bead. Make a loop at the end of the 20-gauge wire to form a head pin. Feed the center-drilled smokey quartz bead on the prepared 20-gauge wire head pin. Create a loop above bead and attach the 20-gauge wire to the 18-gauge wire. Wrap the wire to secure.
I baked the piecrust for only about 15 minutes and then froze it. However, when it was finished, the outside edges were a bit hard so I'm wondering if I overcooked it.
The Australian representative will be chosen next month. The Miss World 2012 pageant will take place in Mongolia on August 18.
The more it soaks the more the mangoes will absorb the spices. Tastes yummy with curd rice.
Next on the list was a peg bag, as ours is a horrible brown thing from the dreaded Tesco and has been left out in the rain a few too many times. I need a better pattern for this - I think the bag bit that holds the pegs needs to be a lot deeper and I had to fudge the edges. However, I do like the fabric, and was even inspired to embroider a peg on the front! Excuse the fuzzy photo, I need to take better ones :-s.
her body with a broom in an attempt to get the demon to leave her, the
I spoke well in the first part of my speech and then, just like the run, I came across a small, steep hill and defeat stood before me.
1 dragon
“The South African government is clear on the role of the media in our democracy, and our Constitution provides expressly for freedom of expression,” the statement continued. It added that the bill sought to balance “the right to access to information on the one hand, and the critical issues of national security.”
As Abel reports, this is happening in: Illinois, Viginia and Texas. The Gaspee has previously reported that checkpoints have also occured in Tennessee. Click here for link.
Um... this wasn't what I had planned for THE GREAT HALLOWEEN COSTUME OF 2011. I'd been giving friends clues about it: "I will be tasty and delicious," I taunted. But, the nearer the end of October came, the longer the hours I ended up working to get this show Big Love off the ground: about 60 hours per week for a couple of weeks, then about 80 the next, and by the last week, I worked - no exaggeration - about 90 hours over seven days. Some people don't believe that this is possible. But I assure you, it is. It just sucks a lot. It's like being in grad school, except that you find yourself wondering why the heck you're still working these kinds of hours even though grad school ended years ago. And it is not exactly conducive to things like also producing a Halloween costume in one's "spare time." So, the show opened on Friday the 28th, and I entered post-show recovery mode, and "Plan Tasty and Delicious" was simply not going to come to fruition in 2011, but I still needed a costume for a ballroom party I was determined to attend on Saturday the 29th.
Paul was adamant about this with the church at Ephesus. Check out the parts in BOLD.
Some statistical analysis for the Losties out there. Kind of.
We stayed at the Moose Hillock Camp Ground. It is great place with lots of fun activies for the kiddos. It has a huge pool with a pirate ship and water slides, a playground, and a stocked fish pond.
We exist in a culture that, day after day, inundates its have-nots with consumerist propaganda, and then, when the social order breaks down, its wealthy and bourgeoisie alike express outrage when the poor steal consumer goods — as opposed to going out and looting an education and a good job.
I was drawn to the colors and textures of all of these elements. I wasn't sure how everything would look together. There are some more classic garden flowers-snapdragons,queen anne's lace and hydrangea-mixed with some things that I usually avoid-protea-and some new to me things-kangaroo paw and pink lepto.
I told her “I know a technique that helps calm children. Would that help?” She nodded. I continued “I’ll say a poem and it will give instructions about tapping on different parts of the head and body. If you tap on those parts as I say it, it may help him. Start tapping on the side of his hand underneath his little finger – his karate chop point.”
“General Wei,” the transmission was laced with background static but clearly discernible, “this is General Watanabe of the PLAAF. I understand that you are pursuing some American rebels in the Okefenokee Swamp.”
I keep a "wish list" and every time they have a big sale I buy several items from my list.
It is wonderful to have someone in my life who not only cares enough to want to be in all those places with me, but who can do it with the charm of Rhett Butler.
H - Before the world ends...?
Sheoldred, Whispering One
It's almost as though I picked up 5 pounds and then maintained for two months. I had 750 minutes of exercise in April; 500 in March. In both months, I had hoped to hit 1000. This month, I might make it, because I'm now on a bit of a roll.
As adoptive parents, we need to get past any insecurities we have about our childrens feelings for and connection to their first parents. Period. When your child asks you about his or her birthparents, you need to answer truthfully, respectfully and with great compassion. There is no place for envy nor insecurity. This needs to carry through into your child's adolescent and adult years, when he or she may even choose to search for and/or increase contact with the other family.
Here's what I expect:
University of Southern California head coach
Q: You are appearing in Director Izutsu Kazuyuki’s “Soar with the Gold,” filming together with Asano Tadanobu and Tsumabuki Satoshi. Is it because of TVXQ that you are able to appear in this movie?
Hope you had a lovely Easter Sunday yesterday.
So in theory, this looks fantastic — we should blow the competition away! But the hardest question remains: how do we make this and still have it fit into the provided constraints?
On Friday, Norris told a radio talk show host in Seattle that she came up with the idea because "as a cartoonist, I just felt so much passion about what had happened..." noting that "it's a cartoonist's job to be non-PC."
Where is the stream of press releases being sent out to all the major papers across the country? Why aren’t we sending ads and promo DVD’s to ESPN and trying to get them to interview USATF “staff” and athletes of note? Why aren’t promotional DVD’s begin sent out in mass to news affiliates across America? We have Tre and Ashton, why aren’t they being used like Dan and Dave? Yes, I know that Dan and Dave was an Olympic promotion – and that is precisely my point. Just because the rest of the world waits for the Olympics to come around doesn’t mean WE have to wait until the Olympics to tell OUR story!
So I was a cerebral, introspective, compulsive nerd.
But these study authors inadvertently showed why the story of simple-to-complex evolution is not scientific. They did not observe nature constructing bacterial genes, but they did observe bacteria losing genes. Gene loss may be termed “evolution” by some, but it provides absolutely no support for big-picture evolution. If evolution describes both the reduction and addition of genes, then it really doesn’t describe anything.
"Keep your self-respect Moon. Don't follow what you don't believe, and don't waste your time with idiots or people who don't believe in you. Life is to dam short".
- Be brave enough to kill a tiger if it’s endangering them.
“While it is common knowledge how corrupt ANC politicians are, this initiative is not only meant to address corruption because that would imply that our economic and social problems would be solved if the politicians were not corrupt. Corruption in itself is not the root problem but it is rather the ‘legal’ robbery of South Africa by a few large international and local corporations and this robbery is rubber-stamped by government, both ANC and DA. Political corruption is only an inevitable result of a corrupt system.”
Target Audience: Full-spectrum
Lowest average age for losing virginity:
Spare a thought for me, the poet…
What follows is stupid and ridiculous in a way only Raging Sharks can imagine. In a kind of bizarre, insane, badly crafted amalgamation of Jaws, Indiana Jones, any given Mafia movie and any movie starring Stephen Baldwin, our boy Baldwin soon realises that he’s embroiled in a cryptic race against time to recover the lost fortune of the Medici that is stashed somewhere beneath Venice seemingly guarded by ferocious sharks and to complicate matters more his ruddy girlfriend goes and gets herself abducted by Mafia hoodlums in a dastardly ploy to ensure that the Baldwin will risk everything to secure the loot for their own gangstery ends. So essentially, Stephen Baldwin fights sharks, shoots and gets shot at by Mafiosi types, solves cryptic riddles and hunts for legendary treasure all in one movie. Kind of like The Da Vinci Code raping Jaws while The Godfather watches. God, I hate you, Da Vinci Code.
I've heard good and bad things about the show we did. That's quite normal, so I don't care actually because I was quite satisfied with our performance.
"It is for the money, isn't it? It's not so you can wear these little outfits?"
The night wrapped around them like a velvety shroud. They walked for a while, keeping to the outer edges of the forest. Eventually, the trees started to thin out and the ground started to curve upwards. Beyond was an open craggy slope without much shelter, so they found a cozy shrub and settled down for a nap.
I am not afraid that my kids will never learn not to hit people or scream at people, just like I was not afraid they would never walk. My kids know they shouldn't hit people. They know it isn't nice to scream at people. They even often apologize for doing these things, without me requiring it.
One of my favorite narratives in the Bible is found in 1 Samuel 3. I can not imagine how Samuel must have felt through this entire encounter. Maybe it would be best if you take a moment and go read that chapter. While you do, try to imagine the emotions Samuel would have felt. (frustration, excitement, fear, wonder, etc...) And remember, you are reading about maybe a 12 year old boy. This isn't the adult prophet Samuel that we encounter in later scriptures. This is a young boy serving in the temple. (you can catch up on Samuel's history by reading the first two chapter if you are so motivated) So, go read it....
my Stampin Up "Top Note" die, and then a stamp from the
Do these people really believe what they are saying?
Here is an image of what the two page spread looks like:
In short, Thorn was appealing against the decision of Mr Justice Mann that its product infringed Siemens' patent and that Siemens was entitled to recover damages in respect of a period of infringement that actually pre-dated its registration as proprietor of the patent. Siemens become the owner of the patent by universal succession under Swiss law, following a series of mergers among Swiss companies. Siemens' patent was for a protective covering for printed circuit boards and method for their manufacture. The protective coating consisted of a plastic film to which wax was added. The wax was said to facilitate through-plating and soldering operations through the protective coating. The film was fused on to the printed circuit board by the action of heat.
Whether you know one scripture or not.
At the end of each day, we'd just hang out, cook dinner, gossip, play games and drink gin & tonics. I remember how my grandfather used to sometimes call out, in his booming British voice, "Noise level too high!"
Music the Monstrous Miracle.
These photos from 2009 are brought to you courtesy of a very hectic past few days which included:
During HSN's 34th Birthday Party, the daily giveaways add up to more than $100,000 and you can win one of eight once-in-a-lifetime experiences...like a trip for two to New York City, including accommodations at The Plaza Hotel and dinner at Todd English’s Food Hall restaurant!
The above picture is the mustard as it is now served at McSorley's Old Ale House. For those who are over a certain age this is only the latest instance of accommodating the least of us at the inconvenience of the majority.
679 D-IX/24/1974. “Notes on Mr. Strauss’s Three Essay in Interpretation.” The Irregular Seminar in Political Philosophy, The University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois.
Have ready a 9×13 inch pan lightly coated with cooking spray. In a small bowl, stir together the corn starch and powdered sugar. Dust the bottom and sides of the pan with the mixture. Tap off the excess and reserve.
This month the challenge for the Papertrey Ink blog hop was to use FLOWERS! Woohoo! I'm so excited to actually get to play this month, (and very happy to say that I have made the transition to night shift and am no longer a walking zombie!). Click on the blog hop image above and you can follow along with the hop or even play along too! I created two pieces for this month's hop, using my most recent PTI order!
1oz Sweet and Sour (I use a personally mix of lemon, lime and cane sugar)
Mr. Chang: If you had asked your questions in August, very few people would have been thinking about the failure of the Communist Party, but now people are actually starting to talk about it, because signs of erosion in the system are unmistakable. Why has it not been part of the discussion? Because on Sept. 10, 2001, people weren’t thinking about al-Qaeda flying planes into American buildings, although al-Qaeda had for five years been attacking American interests around the world, including the World Trade Center. Tell me why Americans are blind.
Money Remaining: $ 609,000
Chartis has rolled out Leaders Risk Protector, a modular-insurance plan designed for schools, associations and public entities and the exposures of their employees and management staff.
I suddenly want to write about games of Concentration that spread through every room in the house. I want to tell you that Teri and Ginger and I made go-go boots from mud, and tried to feed our dead goldfish to a cat named Snoopy. I remember a painting of Susie's, a tree silhoutted on orange background, that hung in our Grandmother's house. And that guy on my left punched me in the eye when he took a swing at my high school boyfriend and missed.
Due to cutbacks, WDDC has had to lay off two key employees, one a counselor for the children.
For months, one week in April glared off my calendar menacingly. My husband and I focused all of our attention and energy on getting to that week and getting through that week—appointments, birthday parties, wedding, special church services, meetings, and holiday activities piled on top of our normal schedule.
When other helpers fail and comforts flee,
There will be no more mistakes, that, I'm sure of but, I will no longer allow myself to be a martyr for pain.
with a single objective – to manufacture and disseminate extreme hatred towards targeted members of the native, indigenous
Everyone had a ticket and they sat & stood around talking and/or looking at the TV screen; and every so often someone would ask to go into the birthing room, and so I would have to go into the birthing room to see if this person had permission to enter the birthing room.
One of those games was on April 20, when the Hawks beat the C’s in Atlanta, 97-92. Boston covered the number in that game, catching 10.5 points. The total was 179.5, but soared Over by almost 10 points.
So I decided to try it all again, from scratch, but I had an email from Intuit thanking me for signing up. This had a link. I tried the link and it is stuck on directions to enable syncing, which is already enabled. Trying to go through the process from within QuickBooks just ends here:
The scream I let loose was exceeded in volume only by the gradually nearing sirens.
Book club was about a month ago, and I’m still reflecting on this book. There are certain passages and themes that I love—how a family can pull together to help raise a child, how education and modern mentoring can sketch a path for success for at-risk youth, and even how military school can be a life-defining, positive experience. There are certain parts that raise my level of cynicism—the two Moores weren’t really from the same neighborhood, they just intersected there briefly much later in life, after their paths were mostly set. The author’s brush with the law seemed similar to every teenager’s run-in with the cops, and the other Wes Moore’s was much more severe. Toward the end, the book drifts off into a litany of the many achievements of the author (by the way, they are undeniably incredible achievements for someone so young). It is not until the afterword, published in the paperback version, that Moore attempts to answer the central question of the book: Why did these two men ended up with such incredibly different lives?
One of the reasons is you're telling me, not showing me. And you're telling me in a very static (rather than dynamic) way.
Sometimes I face the same dilemma with writing. Instead of my usual, “What shall I wear today?” I find myself staring blankly at my computer screen. “What shall I write?”
Helen Goodwin
There you have it - our lucky winner and our Fab 5! spotlight. Have a great Sunday - tomorrow Laura is back with a fun surprise for all you - You won't want to miss her awesome sketch and post. See you then
I wouldn't have a clue
Gordon Titchener, Thompson Rivers University. The Design Is the Destination: The Media Ecology of Contemporary
Susan deftly developed a captivating concept with solid world-building, comprehensible futuristic slang, and characters who matter. There are two love interests for Kira. Raf is a loyal friend and all-around good guy, who the reader can't help but love, but bad-boy Simon turns out to be a heart-breaker, too. They're all caught up in a complex society they barely understand.
- You can also buy frozen cauliflower? This can come in very handy to reduce a little time.
Football star Cole Riley is notorious for doing as he pleases—on the field and off. He parties hard and fights harder, but if he doesn’t clean up his act, his career is over—so Cole reluctantly agrees to work with image makeover consultant Savannah Brooks. He’s not used to being told what to do, especially by some (admittedly hot) southern belle. As for Savannah, she’s not convinced she can transform this cocky (and aggressively sexy) force of nature. But she’s determined to give it her best shot.
That rock, rock, rock, rock, rock and roll.
And since you’re not eating during lunch, you use the time to talk to God. That’s prayer.
A young salesman hung a movie poster in his work area. It wasn’t obscene or offensive, but it was more appropriate for a college dorm room than an office selling expensive products.
I also remember it as a time for a first real date (yes, girls do that earlier today also). A date where a young man in a tuxedo picks the girl up in a car, either driven by the date or the date's parents. There were flowers for the wrist, and pictures taken by both parents. It's a time for memories, memories which will stay with the couple (or at least the girl) for a lifetime.
Just as I tried when he came home from work in bad moods from people who could sense, as he put it, that he was weird and they’d step back from him nervously. He could never look people in the eye either. It really bothered him, even me, talking to me, he’d always look away. He said he is always thinking weird things and is afraid people can see his thoughts of wishing they were dead or whatever he thought of at that time.
there is waiting for a phone
As the premieres roll back camera, now just in their sly infant-stepping phase, the drop off teetering effect (hopefully fulfilling our next phase wants) (and hopefully not the deciding factor) shows injury as top story. Let’s compare notes and laugh at our non-investigative ways, it’s terrific to experience victory across all the fronts, and the Magic can win without Howard and the Bulls can win without Rose (update: they didn’t) and right now the Celtics, after looking slow and tired and lethargic, are kicking into Truth gear and the dee is tighter, can win without Rondo (not an injury though) and Allen (update: they did). The list will most likely grow, and that’s the shame of pro sport, that timing is everything (update: Josh Smith?).
In 2011 the following cases reached mainstream media; in January Siddqa a 25 year old Afghani woman was stoned together with her boyfriend after she had eloped to be with him, running away from an arranged marriage in which she had been sold for $9000 against her will. In May, Katya Koren a 19 year old Muslim girl from Crimea in Ukraine was stoned to death under ‘Sharia law’ after taking part in a beauty contest. In June, Fazia a Pakistani woman from the village of Khyber-Pakhtunkhwa was stoned to death by her husband and his friends for allegedly having an affair with his brother. These are the stories that made it into the global news sphere but the possibility of more discreet killings having taken place cannot be ruled off.
In fact, the only person the series has managed to keep under wraps so far has been Kalinda. An investigator with a mysterious past, the only personal detail we’ve gotten so far is one that drove a railroad spike into one of the series’ most important dynamics. Kalinda had slept with Alicia’s husband long before the two women met, a betrayal-in-hindsight that Alicia could not stomach.
When my husband's job moved us from Texas to Oregon I was really worried about finding other moms to connect with. Having to start all over again really scared me. I really missed having my sister-friends around me. Then I got pregnant with my daughter and found a couple of resources that led me to a whole new group of amazing moms. The forums for the web version of Mothering Magazine let me to my "tribe" (def 2) and very soon I was no longer alone in a new town. Once I decided who would care for me during my prengancy and where I would give birth to my daughter I found yet another amazing group of women and families through the Andaluz Waterbirth Center. Some of those women have become my best friends.
The pottery industry in East Liverpool had begun in the 1840s with the manufacture of yellow ware from the rice deposits of local clay. By 1870, consumers' tastes had shifted to the increasingly popular white ware being imported from England and the Laughlin brothers took advantage of City Council's offer of seed money to anyone who would produce white ware.
I'm wearing Etude House Fresh Cherry Tint in #2 Pink as a stain, with NYX Rose Lipliner and MAC Girl About Town Lipstick on top. On the cheeks I'm wearing NARS Desire for blush, and Clio Professional Art Highlighter in #2 Soft Pink to highlight.
If you reading this blog post online and you are not already an Expat Women member, please support us and sign up here to receive our monthly, motivational newsletters.
We have been working in the garden, though. Things are being planted and things are greening up. John picked up and planted some Walla Walla onions. He went to Art Knapps last weekend and picked up a set of starter onions because the ones we started from seed just were not doing very well. We made the mistake of using garden soil in the starter pots and ended up with fungus flies. Seeds were coming up and then being nibbled. We've thrown pretty much all of the starter pots out and bought peat pellets to start more seeds. I love those!
Mr James Ainslie presided. The meeting having been made open, Mr Tait explained the steps which had been taken preparatory to calling the meeting and the meeting held last Friday. He stated that at the meeting last week of the leading creditors the whole position was explained, and the accountants suggested that there should be a scheme of reconstruction practically to bring the concern into form once more. He would just like to say that personally he was of opinion that there should be reconstruction, that it would be nothing short of a national calamity to allow a business of this kind to go to the wall. With that view he had framed a scheme of reconstruction. That scheme would be read to the meeting, and if they did not understand it he would explain. The report of investigation was then read.
While completely unexciting but entirely satisfying, the first month was spent organizing the home and life I have created over the past 47 years, 13 of which have been spent in the same house. That’s nearly 28% of my life lived in the same house…not a long time by some standards but an eternity by others. It is 13 years of acquiring, collecting, and storing. Thirteen years that have included the many stages of my daughter’s lives (pre-school, soccer teams, music lessons, art classes…) and 13 years of additions to my husband’s tool collection (sigh!).
(garden)
I do not have a picture of the cooked dish we were all starving and forgot to snap a picture. :)
and it that sense, i guess this is a birth for me. the baby being the first big dot. and the smaller dots being its first connection. family, siblings, toys, pets … some are more important for now, symbolized by the size of the dots …
My latest life changes are just that. Life Changes. I am going to make the most of them. I will create my own opportunities. I am creating my future. I’ll keep writing about my experiences and what I am learning. Joys and sorrows, ups and downs, challenges and opportunities.
Arjuna’s despair
Through faith, prayer, obedience and love, we can introduce our family and others to Jesus Christ. He is OUR ARK of SALVATION!
Kathleen Ortiz has talked me off the ledge more times than I can count and has gone beyond the call of duty of representation. Her determination and loyalty to her clients is nothing short of divine, and those lucky enough to sign with her find a rare gem indeed.
Every time he returns he fits less into the home that was once his security. He chafes at the changes i make and wonders aloud when i am going to move to a smaller place. He finds it difficult to eat as a family and often reminds me of his childhood with a silly or sweet story. His room is just a storage unit that he sleeps in. He remarks often that he will not be home next summer, he will find a place there. I remark that he is welcome to come home if he wants. He is moving on right before my eyes and it is as it should be. At times i am aware, at times i am not. His independence is my old age, my change of life, and although it is as it should be; it is not always wanted or accepted.
Varahamihira was invited to Persia to translate Indian Work to Persian and Al-Beruni came to India fundamentally to learn astronomy. The greeks use the same meaning names for Rasis as we do. There is at least a fair case for thinking that some knowledge of astronomy travelled from Indians to the Greeks. This was unthinkable in colonial times, but perfectly thinkable in 21st century Free India. India was one of the higher centers of learning and people came to us not only for our spices or our philosophy but also for our science and for our mathematics.
How can she be qualified when she doesn’t have a single $1.2-million-a-year lobbyist in her family? How can she relate to “lunch-bucket” Americans the way lunch-bucket blowhard Joe Biden can?
Chrissie
I know nobody knows
First trimester symptoms…. I was very tired during my first trimester. I never really was nautilus, but the though of certain foods occasionally made me sick; especial eggs. Also when I first had an inclination that I was pregnant, my face was burning up all the time and the breakfast pizza that was served to my students made me feel sick. My boobs also grew quickly and I had to get my dress let out in that area for Ashley’s wedding… it was then that I knew I had to be pregnant.
This week I want to make things a little more complicated because, of course, we live in a really complicated world. Photons act as both waves and particles. 83% of the universe is something called “dark matter” that we’re not even entirely sure exists. And, of course, the world is both challenging and seductive, in need of saving and savoring both.
i cannot believe how much food i ate...but it was all fantastic.
And keep in mind that there's no law that says the applicant has to be able to meet their requirements by age 18 or any other magic number.
After 5 years of entering giveaways on blogs I won something. Yay me. I am wearing them right now. I love them.
fucking who you are.
In leadership the greatest gap exists between Being, Doing and Having. To understand this better, you cannot HAVE, unless you DO and that means BEING (a Transformational Leader).
"What do you do?" asked Kate.
It’s just, I mean, well . . .
Papa: Still to high (climbs on the chair and reaches(
3. In 1934 a new Securities Act was promulgated in the United States, together with the Gold Act, which required all bullion gold and gold coin to be surrendered to the Federal Reserve, a private corporation chartered to operate as the Central Bank of the United States and to be the issuer of the currency known as the United States Dollar.
At the 1977 assembly, the new LCWR president, Sister Joan Doyle, BVM, related that sisters were moving into “socio-political ministries” in or out of Church institutions, and she called for women’s involvement in decision-making at every level of the Church, as well as “active participation in all aspects of the church’s ministry.” It was during the 1970s that the LCWR board voted to join the National Organization for Women’s boycott of convention sites in states that had not ratified the Equal Rights Amendment, and the board obtained NGO status for the LCWR at the United Nations.
But Kopple's resume meant little to the strikers of Harlan County. It was dedication that would earn her 3-person film crew their trust. A turning point in her relationship with her film subjects came after a car accident delayed her crew's presence at the early morning picketing. Undeterred, the team walked over a mile to to protest site with cumbersome film equipment in hand. Their commitment to documenting the workers' cause was no longer called into question. Strikers offered up their homes for the filmmakers to stay in during the shoot. They became increasingly accustomed to Kopple's camera presence at protests, meetings and even down in the mines, where the opening sequence of the film was shot. One vivid scene in the documentary depicts a meeting at the local Multi- Purpose Center, in which internal grievances are aired heatedly. It's unlikely that strategy disagreements within the union movement would have been expressed in front of a crew that the participants felt uncomfortable with.
When you are when looking to purchase an item for a mere fraction of the retail price tag, you may decide to look at the sales in your local shops. If you want a fun and exciting way to shop, look no further than auction bidding sites India. Not only it is entertaining to try to be the winning bidder on a great item, it is also a fabulous way to save money and takes delivery of products that you may not have generally purchased because of a lofty price tag. To participate in bidding sites India, many people today are interested. Following are the steps that will tell you what you need to do when you are into online bidding.
I recommend using Tofutti's sour cream for the dollop on top - it's the richest version on the market, and will be most like the creme fraiche that would be served with a non-vegan version of this soup. I also recommend focaccia on the side to round out the meal - and soak up the last of the broth. Make your own, or take a short cut and try the onion focaccia from Iggy's bakery - it's located in Massachusetts, but they sell it at my local New York Whole Foods, and may at a store near you as well.
Maria Menounos. After making fun of another minty green gown earlier in this review, I have to laugh a bit that this one is on my best dressed. The vibe is completely differing. It's green chiffon layered over a shimmering gold fabric, and it the cut of the gown makes her look like a greek goddess. LOVED this gown.Ellie Kemper in Armani Prive. I LOVED this gown. I have to admit I wanted to smack Ellie for referring to it as a 'rust' color. Rust is ugly. Copper is pretty. I'm surprised that the color goes so well with her red hair, but this was a definite hit for me. And moving on to our first nominee for Best Dressed. Jennifer Lopez' daring and revealing Zuhair Murad gown was gorgeous and hugged her curves in all the right places. As to the alleged wardrobe malfunction...I don't believe for a second that it happened. With a plunging neckline that, she was probably glued into that dress to make sure that everything stayed where it was supposed it.George Clooney must have known he wasn't taking home the statue, but it was okay because his girlfriend Stacy Keibler's was Oscar personified in her Marchesa dress. I usually hate the gold dress-like-oscar gowns, but this one is just so flattering and hugs her in all the right places. I was highly amused by the E! commentary, when one of the stylists gasped and realized where the 'missing' gold Marchesa gown she'd wanted for one of her clients was. It's good to be Clooney's girlfriend.Emma Stone in Giambattista Valli. I LOVE this gown. She looked so statuesque. I loved the bow, I loved the slip from neck to navel that was only visible once she began presenting, the belted waist, and and I love how the raspberry fabric flowed around her. There's been a lot of criticism regarding her selection, saying she wore the same dress as Nicole Kidman wore in 2007. Folks, they each were a shade of red and had a bow. The comparison stops there. She looks gorgeous, and she's high on my best dressed list. Rose Byrne in Vivienne Westwood. Va Va VA Voom!!! Westwood is admittedly one of my favorite designers, but wow. The gown (which is apparently midnight blue...not black), shimmers, fits her like a slim column, and has an amazing one shoulder strap. The platform peep toe shoes, the long silver earrings, and the severe bob cut just makes this outfit sophisticated perfection. I want to be her.Gwyneth Paltrow in Tom Ford. She looks like a million dollars and is officially my hero if she succeeds in helping the cape to make a comeback. The elegant and simple lines of the gown and cape are just perfect, and I was amazed at how well the one shoulder look works with the cape. The award for Best Dressed goes to Jessica Chastain in her larger-than-life McQueen gown. The gold embroidery and beading on black is just stunning, and it had a gorgeous train. The colors worked very well with her red hair. Before I knew it was a McQueen gown, I was immediately reminded of his iconic Peacock dress. Just like every girl dreams of her wedding dress, I think if you grow up dreaming of going to the Oscars, this is the kind of dress you dream of and it's the kind of dress you wear when money is no object.
9. Bake for 50 minutes-1 hour. The cake is done when it has an even golden brown color to it – you may need to turn the dish around for an even color. (You must check it. I don’t think I have ever made this and baked the cake for the same period of time. It’s just one of those recipes).
Another reason to make it a delightful day...there's a new sketch in town for card makers! Artful Delight is now offering a monthly CARD sketch challenge in addition to their monthly layout challenge. So this is good news! There are tow sketches to play along with, you can have you can have chances to enter. One random winner will have their choice between a scrapbook kit or a card kit! You can read more about the details on this post over at Artful Delight. I really encourage you to play along-you have most of the month to work with the sketch- I designed it to work for many kinds of card styles, so please be creative!
Papers: Bazill- white and red cardstock, Canson 300 g watercolorpaper,
Completely lost my shit in the library just now. Hundreds of Asians really pissed off at me but it is totally worth it.
For her new single, British songstress Delilah goes back to the beginning with “Breathe”, a track previously given away as a free download last year, and now gets a revamp for its single status. At first I wasn’t sure about this single choice, since both “Go” & “Love You So” were so brilliant, but the new mix added the bells & whistles while still keeping the subtleties of the original demo. The demo sounded like Zero 7 to my ears, but this new version is closer to the Portishead school of hopelessly sombre and bleak night music. Those haunting strings at the end are just masterful.
I think she thanks me, but I can barely hear her. bursting into tears, I slam my head into the pillow. After sobbing for a few minutes, I get up and pick up the razor blade.
Lots of pretty goodies!!
-At the start there will be 1,694 portable toilets, 42,000 PowerBars, 90,000 bottles of water and 563 pounds of Dunkin’ Donuts coffee beans, enough to make 45,000 cups. About 500 volunteers will collect more than 10 tons of sweat suits, sleeping bags and Snuggies, much of which will be cleaned and given to charities. The bridge must be cleared within an hour of the last runner’s leaving. More than 70 United Parcel Service trucks will take the athletes’ belongings to the finish line.
“Did you say side saddle?”
United Breweries - UB Group Cobra
Gather and pack all non-clothing gear, including Garmin, iPod, Gu's, nuun, fuel belt, etc. Don't forget plenty of charging cords.
Rafts of ducks are everywhere along the Great lakes flyway. Above, a common merganser takes to flight in the freshly thawed marsh. Below, Greater scaups wander in toward shore in range of my 400mm lens.
The Council, via Delta, says “up you” if citizens don’t like it.
Full of CHOOOOOOOOOOONZ – some of which you may not even know (yet)!
Casper: You know, the friendly ghost! This is a fun, light hearted movie with Christina Ricci. Nothing really scary here, but it's entertaining. Plus, I remember when it came out and the guy playing Casper was HOOOT! Please forgive me for saying that!
Amount Requested
What is your take on the current state of the punk/diy scene locally in Swansea and nationally within Wales?
QI: Exxon Paid Almost $1M per Hour in Income Taxes and Its Effective Tax Rate Was 42.3%: "1. ExxonMobil paid $8 billion in income taxes to various governments in the first quarter, which is about $22 million in income taxes each day, or almost $1 million each hour.
JEAN DE FLORETTE (France) directed by Claude Berri
If you have to mail them in a diffent pacakge let me know.
Dumas wished he could change anything.
I don't want any kids to feel left out or excluded or made to feel inferior - absolutely not. What I want is for them to be educated honestly. I want them to learn that in life there are winners and losers. I want them to understand you don't always get absolutely everything that everyone else does. When they succeed or do well I want them to be able to revel in that accomplishment. I want them to be practised in the art of being both a good winner and a good loser. I want them to lose or fail and feel disappointed and know how to pick themselves up and try again.
They do not condemn me, generally.
–While the good deeds that we do may have some functional value in the temporal world we live in they will never be enough to save us. When the logic of Jesus’ statement really becomes clear we understand that doing good deeds alone does not change the spiritual status of a person one bit.
½ tsp red pepper flakes
BG: Yeah, we all had names that Gary called us, names from videos mostly. Dave was Wild Thing. Hamid was La Forge. I was Willis. Gary said we had to use them when we were on missions.
The Examiner says the whole thing cost £4m and is seven months late. I think it's about a year to be honest - when Kirklees Council asked people to choose options on designs for the square, it said it would be finished in 'autumn 2008'
Cayenne pepper increases the pain threshold in migraine patients. Dissolve a pinch in hot water and drink as tea or sprinkle on food.
PSP Accessories You Can’t Live Without
Because like you there is none other
I miss him already.
But anyway, after my little rant on twitter came a tidal wave of fury like I've never seen before. The last time I got so many replies was when I dyed my hair pink which for some reason made people feel like they need to let me know what they think of it.
Pack vinyl eco-friendly shopping bag that passes for computer bag (the dog ate mine) with the essentials:
And now she is one. No longer "zero", as her big sisters would say. She is one. A toddler, not a baby. And I'm not a spring chicken, myself, anymore. No more babies for me. No more peanuts in the bed.
I was touched …. and humbled that my du’a … I had not even finished the supplication and here Allah has answered. Allahu akhbar! … Allah’s compassion and mercy are endless, masya’Allah!
I make snap decisions...frequently.
2 tablespoons ginger, grated
timpani’s boom, life’s promise of doom
We delved into Bellicose and we found the maze. We traversed the maze and we found the chamber of your "heart's desire". Scrawled above the door was a stern warning about not entering the maze twice. Something about "half your life" or "half dead" or similar.
Another businessman said Plettenberg Bay police were afraid to act against the criminals because "they are scared of their lawyer”.
If that rendition was on vinyl and you played it backwards I bet you’d hear Francis Scott Key screaming as if on fire.
AgentFest to be the largest event of its kind in the world! Over 55 agents will join us this year!
Kind of funny.
Cross Trainer. 10 Minutes. 0.66 km. Little warm up before spinning to keep my legs ticking over.
The 24-year-old singer and actress rocked a dandelion print A.L.C jumpsuit with a tweed grey blazer coat. The chic street style ensemble was accessorized with stud earrings, a chunky gold necklace, multiple gold cocktail rings and a blush Christian Louboutin ‘Duvette’ pumps with gold toe-caps.
A really cute tin to keep long after the lip balms are used up.
I sympathize with the competitors who ran great times on Monday. But I’ve also watched some 40 plus years worth of sprint and hurdle races where records were lost to minute puffs of wind. I’ve watched athletes have entire performances taken away because they stepped on a line one time too many. And records nullified because a track was measured centimeters too short or wind gauges prove to be faulty, or jump or vault standards moved slightly after the jump. Performances don’t always fall within the scope of the rules – that’s part of the sport. The sad thing is that these performances were outside the scope of the rules before the gun went off, and everyone knew it. So to now cry “change the rules”, or simply “allow these performances” is a cry too little too late.
Soo, here's the part two with pictures of the dresses I was talking about in the last post...
chocolate pave
“I will show you,” he said, and he clapped his hands. A magical picture appeared within a huge icy wall of a land all blue and green. “This is the world called Earth,” he said. “Every year, in the season they call winter, your task will be to cover as much of it as you can with snow. Remember, if you fail, your people will suffer! You must start off at once for the place where Earth meets the sky, and there you will live and carry out your work. From now on you will be called Snow Woman, and this task will be yours from now until the end of time.”
Kim Bailey Racing Partnership
I've noticed over the years something about taste and the people who have "discerning" taste.
Selflessly gave time and patience,
Level 16: MP Cost: 35, Damage: 254%, Attacks up to 6 enemies 3 times, 16% chance to stun the enemy for 4 seconds.
Build-A-Bear Workshop sent me a sheep from their Farmers' Market Collection to review.
All thoughts are like spoiled children. Some of them are illegitimate as well. They are conceived and are born as a result of one’s reactions to events in his or her everyday life. We turn out to become bad parents for most of them. The prematurely born, neglected thoughts grow up on their own and decide their own course of life and action without caring for anyone. As a matter of justification, they harp on the condescending attitudes received at the hands of their parents and an absence of all nurturing and disciplining efforts which they consider to be due to them. Our step fatherly behavior continuously produces a junk of a community of off springs which continues occupying spaces in our ever-expanding minds. We think of and treat these spaces in the same ways in which our governments think of the slums of our cities. We also dread them. The world becomes the dignitary which comes visiting our selves and we quickly and unhesitatingly hush the slums from its view. What is presented to the visitor is a selected scene which depicts a rich élite culture of our mind that we feel proud of putting up for display at exhibitions we arrange each day of our lives.
As Tanner regained his hearing, the sound of the .50 caliber and his teammates’ M4′s comforted him. Once the two teammates were out of the rear of the wrecked HMMWV, everyone re-mounted the vehicles while the .50 cal gunner provided cover. Tanner rolled a HE grenade into the carcass of the Hummer as he swung into the back of one of the five-ton trucks and flattened himself to take advantage of the truck’s metal sides.
My son got over his grumbles from "breaking the rules about bringing in a garden flower" when I showed him the corsage I made for his teacher to wear.
When a country is occupied by communist rulers, you can be sure that they will keep stirring the pot, while it simmers just below boiling point. The country’s police service is usually in the frontline of this onslaught. It’s the last place where these comrades need a stable prim-and-proper management, hence the reason why the National Commissioner of the police will often get caught in the crossfire.
The blonde (called Dorothy) replied: 'Of the three questions, I found this the easiest to answer.'
Not raining,
22. Slow Moving Cattle
07. Mienai Kyori
The left immediately cited Sarah Palin having used a map “targeting” Democrats. It didn’t matter that it was DEMOCRATS who invented these “targeting maps.” Nor did it matter that the Democrat PARTY – not just some politician who wasn’t even in office anymore like Sarah Palin – had used these maps themselves (both the Democratic Leadership Committee and the Democratic Congressional Campaign Committee are were discovered to have used such maps).
Being “plugged in” is a joy, but it can take over your life.
Scarborough: 50% of peope dislike Mitt Romney
Y'all know the story about the 'Dutch kid and the finger in the Dam'?
Just kidding, those pictures will be up next. Hope your last week isn't too hectic!
Lucky’s ma was well known for her Agnes Moorhead voice (the Agnes Moorhead I know from Citizen Kane), offen sported a towel wrapped around her head, with her lips all painted red I thought she looked like the movie star just comin’ out of the shower; given the heinousness of choices I’d chose Lucky’s ma over Agnes Moorhead any day ‘cause Lucky’s ma was there in the flesh and Agnes Moorhead wasn’t; had several snapshots of his ma in his wallet Lucky did; showed them to me more than once, that showed just how proud Lucky was of his ma when she was all dolled up and ready to go out and dressed up just like Agnes Moorhead.
(Not gonna lie, I felt a twinge of superiority that I got one over on my frenemy...)
For more information on Event Horizon visit the project’s dedicated website launching February 25, 2010 at www.EventHorizonNewYork.org.
Follow Me at Sew Happy Sew Crafty (or tell me you already do) (1 entry)
Peace comes with the acquisition of new territory, and increases as we get different areas of life under control.
I started with unsubscribing from newsletters from WalMart, Best Buy etc. Then I removed myself from groups on Facebook and Yahoo. Then I cleared up a couple old blogs I had, then I ran into trouble. Who knew that when you delete an old blog that you had to remove the contents first. So now, on picasa, I have 3 albums of 500 photos each that I have to remove one photo at a time. Had I known this I could have deleted the entire album in one click, then removed my blog with another click. It's no big deal, but like a true virgo, I like to clean things up. Another problem is when I used to run a cross stitch group, we had many albums on Webshots, but we used a mutual email between the two community leaders, which is now closed. So forgetting the password, those albums are now inaccessible.
In the style of 60s rebel songs – one woman and her guitar and a crowd sing-along, and the ability to be sung or chanted by others can give a protest song its power.
Immediately add the olive oil and the butter at the same time to allow for maintaining the high temperature without burning the vegetables and eggs during the cooking process.
Simone looked up at him with those big, blue eyes. “Why not?”
M. Ondaatje
Q: Can anyone get Lash Extensions?
So know I have lost a few friends and broken a few hearts for not thanking them in my speech I will be off. For a hot shower to thaw out!
So you don't need to apologise (oh well, that's up to you.)
Points Of View
Our Inheritance
Building myself up has become easy after time. You do things you love. I watch movies and listen to happy songs. I dance. I surround myself with happy and positive people. My latest batch of friends are perfect for that sort of thing. When I’m in public, or with people, I do not ever allow myself to be sad or depressing. I don’t ever want to be that guy, the Debbie Downer, the one who kills the mood. I force myself to try and be funny and make people laugh. Sometimes, that’s what I do, when I know I’m sad or depressed, I go to social events or hang out with my friends so I start this performance where everything is okay and I make fun of myself and I try to make people laugh. And in the process of doing this, I end up believing it.
Rosa Klebb
Introverted Sensing: 20-28% (25.4%)
The Model T liberated millions of people who had never traveled more than 12 miles from their homes. That’s the distance a horse could go in a single day. Farm women could now jump into the family Ford and head off to town, anytime they liked. More farmers had cars than bathtubs. When asked why, one farm wife said, “You can’t drive to town in a bathtub.” Ford may have thought of the Model T as everyman’s car, but it was every woman’s car too. Women took to the wheel in droves.
In short, there is no definition of mother tongue. We could live with this: other things that we talk about, like life, or love, or languages, or multilinguals, have no definition either. But what “no definition” in fact means is ‘many definitions’. Which means that everyone defines mother tongue their way, which means that nobody is talking about the same thing when they are talking about mother tongue. The only thing on which there seems to be some agreement is that mother tongue is singular (meaning ‘just one’, not ‘funny’).
The bunch of bananas: (having done nothing since monitoring began in June - See previous blogpost here) has suddenly put on a growth spurt. No need for a photo as it still looks identical, only with fatter bright green bananas. The tree, however has fallen over. We suspect it was already weak, and has been jumped on just one too many times by baboons... Despite propping it up, it seems to be suffering from some type of waterlogging and looks very ill. We are considering harvesting the bunch, in case the tree does not make it. Hopefully the fruit will then ripen in a baboon free enviromnent, controlled by us!
Daniel: Plans for a music video?
I don't think people wanted him to lose because they hate Christians, I think people wanted probability to finally catch up with the problematic way he plays and to snap people out of the delusion that this is "God's will" or magic tricks from above -_- It's kinda like how a cold summer doesn't mean global warming doesn't exist. It's just something that happened that people read meaning into. A hot winter doesn't prove that global warming DOES exist either, but if you PUT your belief into the fact that a cold summer disproves global warming, then you open yourself up that a hot winter disproves your theory.
Easier said than done I guess. Every day though with practice I seek to get away from the extremes; I need to be better at it.
If you’re paying attention to music of late you’ve likely heard lots about the Alabama Shakes, whose debut album, Boys and Girls, dropped last week. If you’re really, really paying attention to music, you maybe caught a song called “You Ain’t Alone” which hit the net last year (maybe you, like me, got it from Aquarium Drunkard), and maybe you, like me, searched in vain for months to find more about this band called The Shakes (which is as shitty a name as possible far as Google goes, almost as bad as The Glands, maybe the greatest unknown band ever)—a band which seemingly had recorded just that one song, “You Ain’t Alone,” which song could well have been an outtake from some old Janis Joplin session you’d never heard of, or, at least, I never had.
I present to you, the SUMMER SEWING CONTEST!
At first I denied it because I didn’t want to look ridiculous and it seemed completely out of character. But $2,000 for one day of work? Hell, I was in! I had about two months of additional training time before the infomercial shoot date, so I decided to kick my training and diet into full gear. I ate only lean meats, eggs and vegetables four times a day. I exercised six days a week and often did double days. I would lift weights for an hour in the afternoon and then swim for 30 minutes after weight training. I dropped down to just under 6% body fat, and it looked awesome! However, I found myself getting weaker and weaker athletically speaking as my roadmap to getting ripped progressed. I was basically on a bodybuilder’s diet, which was pretty much all protein and little-to-no carbohydrates. I found myself lifting less and less weight and being fatigued more quickly in the pool as my body fat dropped.
I'll also have some great birthday-themed posts, and I'll be announcing a HUGE change to my blog that will change Occasionally Crafty forever (In a great way, of course) !
just getting its finishing touches :))
To achieve this beautiful blue, I mixed Caromal Colours Off white Reclaim
18 pounds (9,1 kg) slimmed within 9 weeks
I'd like to have a witty little way to wrap this one up, but I don't. In fact, trying to think of one is making me even more anxious. And, none of us want that, do we?
Surrendering my strong voice
My current blood levels for cholesterol, glucose etc are all within norms. My primary doc is thrilled with the changes I’ve made over this year. My BMI is now in the Overweight category. Never in my life would I have thought I would be thrilled to say I was “overweight”. But when it’s the official term and not just me trying to downplay my morbid obesity by saying the word, it’s a GLORIOUS thing. I feel so confident knowing I’m just “overweight” now.
na ced guru-mukhīyaṁ te
Judging by the way Liana and Koukou were carrying on in the early going, you wouldn't think they were bent on revenge. Playfully swinging on vines, gawking at hippos, and eating various hand fruits, vengeance seems like the furthest thing from their minds. After hearing something off in the distance, Liana decides to investigate. If there's one thing Liana isn't good at, it's sneaking up on people. Already bested by Mabutu's tribesmen, Liana finds herself in a similar situation when the men working for an archaeologist named Johnson (Emilio Linder) stick a bunch of rifles in her face. Luckily for her, Koukou scares them off with some pouch-based tomfoolery (he basically scares them off with fireworks). Unfortunately, though, that leaves Johnson, Bella (Alicia Príncipe), his small-nippled ladyfriend, and their bearded guide Bud (Antonio Mayans) without anyone to carry their gear. Don't worry, it so happens that both parties are going to Blue Mountains, and decide to team up when Bud declares Liana to be "all right."
So here is a picture of the card:
Very soon I have to start on a quilt for one of our grandsons .. he turns 18 in April .. and then another 3 turn 18 next year .. so I will have to get a start on them too ...
Francesca
Where: Home (during the Dayton vs. Louisville game -- GO FLYERS!)
Especially here in the Lone Star State. But- this heat doesn’t exactly mean you can’t pull out the slow cooker for ease in your main meal making. It surely doesn’t stop me. Plus, I’m still in the ‘new toy’ phase with my sorta kinda brand new crock. I got her for Christmas and my life has never been the same.
Oil and tar
Legs (make 2)
So let’s not just walk around saying we’re Christians. Let’s do what the word says and let Christ’s love reflect through us and be a light to someone else.
3. A minister with a southern drawl and three missing fingers on his right hand is a fellow I want to have as the leader of my church, any day.
The list of foods they eat is short, so any time a novelty is accepted I am over the moon. These chicken fingers of Melissa Clark´s were gobbled up enthusiastically yesterday. Or rather, a hastily improvised version, with pork, no more spice than cumin and garlic, and I cooked them under the broiler instead of heating up the oven. This means it´s a golden recipe; if you can improvise so much and it´s still delicious it´s a weeknight winner.
The whole thing is very backwards. I’m trying too hard where I should be surrendering, and throwing in the towel were I should be fighting. That’s not to say that there’s been absolutely no redemption in my life–I am God’s child as much as I am a human being–but I’ve paid my price in the form of numbness, exhaustion, and a nosedive in creativity. (What do you know? Another Trinity parallel.)
I've never met a crafter without a stash of some kind. This year my goal is to use up all the craft supplies I have spent money on that are taking up mental and physical space in my life. Join me here every Thursday for a Stash Bash.
Final Price:$2.50 after coupon
The Secret Museum has been on a mission lately to verify rumors that a thriving Rock music scene actually does exist in the area. The results appear, rather surprisingly, altogether positive. Unfortunately, the number of venues for Rock music remains limited. One group who came to our attention is !!The!!Bang!!Gang!! Comprising Karen Vargas-vocals and guitar, Spanky Golub-bass and Doan Wilson-drums, !!The!!Bang!!Gang!! deliver a lo-fi roar straight outta Olympia circa 1991. They have recently released a 14-song CD, on which now-departed guitarist Cullen Morris joins them. The following interview took place via email.
Their lack of beauty is their beauty. - Rod McKuen
“It’s alright, it’s just a scratch, the bullet went right in and out again, I won’t be 100% with that arm for a while, but I shall recover…” he replies.
I hand the man the order receipt. "The House that Jack Built", he says softly, musingly. His words contain a benediction of hope.
That’s it. The best scene is coming up.
You will then need to cut this into a tag shape. I do this by measuring down 2 inches (5cms) down the sides and in 1 inch (2.5cms) across the top, drawing a line then cutting off the corners, and cutting through both layers. Hopefully the picture below makes it more clearer.
Recently in the last six months I have begun to sing. When it started I thought it was an accident. But to my bewilderment it’s gotten louder and more apparent. This half a year has not been easy in the least, in fact it’s been one of the most arduous because of major lifestyle shifts. Since the taking on my new job and the leaving of my original community, I feel crushed by isolation and ceaselessly bombarded to fall back into my old ways. But I’ve also had an experience of zeal for God and His people. I don’t just want to read my Bible every day, but with eagerness I seek to be transformed by it every day. I am always unsatisfied in the failings to give out my heart to others and yet I find security in the example and promise of almighty God who lives inside of me. I am excited when convicted of sin so that God’s glory might be radiated in the trenches of my life. I am emboldened in faith when I see the victory of the Spirit in cutting through people’s insecurities and doubts through the active expression of blessings for which I was created. This is a very strange thing!
(2)Slowly add water and mix with your hands.
With much affection and gratitude and, to be honest, a little bit of desire,
That's not say that I don't enjoy self-publishing and there isn't something gratifying about the work. Because there is. But anybody that says "self-publishing is easy" is a liar, and you should immediately punch them in the face for being such a liar.
they said, “Sure.” It was that simple. We sent a letter,
I've seen enough people recently have some degree of success selling on COMC that I finally decided to give it a shot myself. Armed with a $20 off coupon (that I might have ended up with thanks to one of you, I can't remember) I sent in 75 total cards for their one-week service, and yesterday I was pleasantly surprised to find that they'd entered everything in two days earlier than estimated. I set about pricing my cards, either starting a bit higher than my lowest accepted price and/or undercutting what was already there, and in no time offers came flying in! As of this writing, I've sold nine cards for $81, which is definitely beyond my expectations this soon. You'll all be happy to hear that every bit of money I make there will go back into cards--you know I'm not in this hobby for profit, what little someone like me can make anyway--especially now that I'll have lots of COMC credit to play with.
Making orange cajeta today and Cherve cheese. When we move to the northeast, I GOTTA have my own cheese cave! That's about Number 181 on my "Gotta Have" list. I am quite sure my real estate guy is beginning to hate me...lol!
Our backyard looks very different now than it
By contrast, the media’s natural instinct is to go for the kill. Bad news sells and there is always plenty of bad news.
About 3 weeks ago, I asked her if she wanted a lift home. In Chinese, I asked her if she would like a "da bian che" 搭便车 (a lift). At least that's what I was going for. But my first tone was a bit off, and instead I said 大便车 which literally means "poop car." So basically I asked her if she wanted to poop car home with me. Ugg. She looked at me with big horrified eyes, and then I realized what I had asked her, and we both burst out laughing.
AB 419/SB 296 allows the Unclaimed Property Administrator to assess a 12% interest penalty on unclaimed property holders who willfully neglect to turn over unclaimed property to my office. The statute used to require the administrator to assess an 18% interest penalty. The added discretion this statute gives to the Unclaimed Property Administrator will allow my office to increase compliance with holder reporting laws through education, without penalizing businesses who found themselves in violation through ignorance of the law.
I have ZERO tolerance for little kids screaming into the microphone. I guess it really does matter if it's not your kid because I hated 7/9ths of the performance.
So then I go on. the road is good and the edge is marked with a white strip. This was really good because the headlights form the oncoming vehicles can be blinding, so I would focus my headlamp on the white strip and ride when they came. The trucks would sometimes even give me a dipper, lower their lights for an instant and that really helped. The climb was tiring, but I’d been expecting it so it was ok. That way the altitudinal profile was very helpful. Soon it started becoming light and I found myself riding a smooth, broadly undulating road. I passed Ayanur in this early morning light before the sun was up and stopped in my tracks as I spotted a large owl sitting on a peepal right above the middle of the road. I could barely make out it’s silhouette and it flew away as I looked up and saw its eye-shine. There were nice forest patches between the villages now and I passed by some patches that looked like erstwhile teak plantations.
Somehow, I was not told that I have to attend a "foreign banding seminar" before my first fill. When I just called to confirm my TUESDAY APPOINTMENT I was told, "Oh... You haven't been to our seminar... Our next one is July 16th and we can't schedule until then."
Spearheaded by nine year 9 students from Centralian Middle School in Alice Springs, the students are putting out a call for second hand boots suitable for children and teenagers.
I got it so that it would send the ADC value, and display it on my controller, but sending NunChuck packets didn’t work. Packet checks out, but it didn’t seem like the remote ATMega328 actually was processing it? Was it a library conflict? I checked the libraries, and there might be a conflict. The software serial library depends on interrupts to function, and if another interrupt is running, it will block them (such as software servo library, or Servo in Arduino). Another thing I realized more, is that the software serial library can only send or receive, it cannot receive while sending.
It's just ridiculous when your neighbour turns around and asks you what the printf function does... Or when he is COMPLETELY unable of even using a computer in the most basic sense by turning on the program we use to edit text...
Coming to play a cleric after all these years of disdain for them I now see that what I describe above (i.e., my behavior) is inherently code-driven. If one doesn't want to attribute an over-arching moral code to it they don't have to. I don't have to, explicitly, when I play D&D. But I do play such a pragmatic and righteous cleric -- one who is willing to smash in heads of prisoners, fly headlong into battle, probe the inner workings of local politics on the off-days in town, to beat back panic, fear, ignorance, group-think, and superstition. Ostensibly in the furtherance of democracy. I suppose this is the Enlightenment ideal applied to D&D. (Or an Enlightenment ideal applied to D&D, anyway.)
52. Nobody want dutty powder. People will not respect you if you have a bad reputation.
Think of the fun you can have with this! Surely, this is why they didn’t make Kinect voice controls speaker-specific, right? Microsoft wanted to encourage people to mess with each other. That’s my theory, at least.
She totally blows me away and I love her to bits.
Rachel and family are here this week.
Raising Seven's price certainly reduced the number of sales in the last ten days of December. However, earnings during that same time period are a different story. I earned about $2 on each copy of Seven at $2.99, so around $308, and only 35 cents on each Stir, for a total of $109. I think it's important for authors to decide whether they want to maximize copies sold or income; it seems to me that you can't go after both goals at once.
Fast forward a few years and with the Storm on the verge of new era of dominance the rival coaches, through their friends in the media, launched a series of attacks on the fact that the Storm were becoming too dominant in the ruck through the use of wrestling tactics. The fact that these were within the rules and nobody else was doing it half as well had nothing to do with their angst. Not. So the ‘Grapple Tackle’ controversy was born and while the league and its judiciary did nothing to stop the trend, the attacks on the team continued.
I am fiendish words twisted
As I’m walking and simultaneously dwelling on my upbringing, (Once you start, it’s hard to stop) a gap in the trees opens up, and I see something that makes me forget all about my childhood: Solitude.
Is it notable for its time that Swift Lightning, the wolf hybrid who is more or less the “star” of the film, comes to a favorable conclusion? Probably not, since his symbolic value as a rather unsubtle stand-in for race and class issues plays to standard discourses that abound in early melodrama. At one point, a hotshot fur trader and rival for Jean’s attentions flies in with his Saint Bernard to help the stranded travelers. The trader, Hugo, seems intent on pairing his dog Buck with Firefly. Gaston, however, is suddenly ready to stand up for the wolf-dog whom he’s been pelting with objects for half the film. “Y’know, it’d be pretty raw if the Collie were to quit Swift Lightning now,” he says. “If he want her, why should he give her up?”
The question of copyright ownership was brought to our attention regarding content you published, “Deadly Dolls” CID 5460013 & 5459106.
The paper's leader doesn't even bother to suggest that Panorama's allegations were a unnecessary dredging up of the past, or even that as the claims don't involve specific accusations of vote buying that they're irrelevant to the bidding process. Instead it just concentrates on the timing (temporary link, leader is quoted in full below):
and forced then to bereave and grieve.
Spanakopita
The ad, from the Institute for Canadian Values, is against the introduction of the McGuinty government’s graphic sex-ed curriculum.
So this unemployment rate has been really stubborn. There are a couple of ways that we can solve that. Number one is to make sure that the overall economy is growing. And so we have continued to take a series of steps to make sure that there’s money in people’s pockets that they can go out there and spend. That’s what these payroll tax cuts were about.
Adult Saturday Full-£50 Discount-£45
One thing is clear from this particular poem and that is that Heaney is less interested in technique – by that I mean showing off – than he is in communication. He, however, has a broader definition that I have. I found this quote by him from the essay ‘Feeling into Words’:
Also, I have two Starbucks I frequent - one has a drive through. A good friend of mine works there and when I picked up my iced-latte, I realized she put a smiley face on the lid. She does this type of trick all the time, but I thought I'd snap a pic and share it.... It definitely put a smile on my face...
Games/Activities
“Hey, hey, BOA, who did you foreclose today?” protesters chanted at a Bank of America office building.
Getting married is a stage which is important for every join who have found a soul mate. After long enough to know each other, sharing stories and trying to unify the ideas. The relationship finally reaching the top point. in fact good establishment to make it as a moment of the most gorgeous is feasible. Time, endeavor and ample funds are given to prepare the wedding. Busyness before marriage is not only felt by couples who are getting married but the house also made dizzy by it.
That was alot of little slips of paper to chop up. I brought my kiddos in for truly “non biased” draw, as they each stuck a hand in and pulled a slip out while not looking!
I wouldn't change a thing.
2. Owls are all the rage this season and I must say I have fallen for them as well. I hope they get along with all of the elephants in my house. These andirons are a perfect gift and only $45.
The EDL is run by 15 key people across the country who co-ordinate activists via email and social networking sites, such as Facebook. The group lacks a coherent message or vision, and even within its core, the EDL means different things to different people. Indeed, none of the 15 so-called leaders appears to have actually met all the others. The main backer is Alan lake, a shadowy figure who has pumped a lot of money into the social networking that started the EDL. Lake has stated he wants to build relations with anybody who is 'anti-Islam' and that includes Lesbian and Gay groups as well as militant Zionists in Britain.
But it felt right
FOOOOORE (See? Totally lame.)
I can't stress enough how many GREAT projects each issue has! Our family received two issues, each of which had between 90-100 projects and activities. We have two boys (ages 2 and 5), and I sat with each of them for about 30 minutes just poring over the fun stuff to do. We've picked out quite a few to do, starting this week, so over the next few weeks, hopefully I'll get some pictures to share on here. :)
WHY IT MATTERS: The resurrection is the cornerstone of Christian belief. A person cannot encounter skeptics and not be able to defend the resurrection on historical grounds to them. The resurrection matters to how people act: they act completely differently depending on whether they believe that this life is all there is, or that this life is just a precursor to eternal life with God. You want someone who takes the long-term perspective.
07 Falling Slowly
Are you praying for your child? Are you praying for someone else’s child? Would you like to add some verses for mothers to cling to and claim as they pray for their children’s salvation?
Cuisine: Thai, Spicy Indian
Humperdink's Greenville Ave.
On top of what ever we decide, I thought it would be nice for him if he got reunited with an old friend. Shopping Etsy this morning, I came across exactly what I wanted him to have. It's perfect.
--hair and boots: umber, cinnamon, tan, burnt umber, caramel, sandstone
For the floor, measure around the lip of the bottom portion of your suitcase and cut out the foam board to fit. Wrap fabric around the foam board and hot glue in place, add a ribbon pull tab (not pictured), and then back it with a piece of poster board. You may be able to use a leftover piece of poster board if you cut using space carefully at the start.
SENATOR MIRIAM Defensor-Santiago and Atty. Narciso Santiago Jr. renewed their vows Saturday. Among the attendees were prominent and controversial politicians including Vice President Jejomar Binay, Ilocos Rep. Imelda Marcos, Pampanga Rep. Gloria Macapagal-Arroyo, former president Joseph Estrada, and Senators Jinggoy Estrada, Bong Revilla, Antonio Trillanes IV, Pia & Alan Peter Cayetano, Loren Legarda, Miguel Zubiri, and Manny Villar. Observers say there was ease in finding these VIPs inside the Cathedral. They were all seated in a row labeled: ‘This is where your taxes go.’
25gm butter
Having worked as Project Manager for Interact, a media firm which ranks as among Italy’s leading developer of solutions for digital media, she joined the BBC in 2006. Here she developed her project management and finance skills working in various roles and departments, including Sales and Distribution, delivering projects and solutions for Motion Gallery’s licensing business, and Repeats Unit, managing the costs for BBC Channels.
- Emerging technologies for schools
"Diamond in the Rough" - 2:54
Freedom House, which dates back to the early I940s, has had interlocks with AIM, the World Anticommunist League, Resistance International, and U.S. government bodies such as Radio Free Europe and the CIA, and has long served as a virtual propaganda arm of the government and international right wing. It sent election monitors to the Rhodesian elections staged by Ian Smith in I979 and found them “fair,” whereas the I980 elections won by Mugabe under British supervision it found dubious. Its election monitors also found the Salvadoran elections of I982 admirable. It has expended substantial resources in criticizing the media for insufficient sympathy with U.S. foreign-policy ventures and excessively harsh criticism of U.S. client states. Its most notable publication of this genre was Peter Braestrup’s Big Story, which contended that the media’s negative portrayal of the Tet offensive helped lose the war. The work is a travesty of scholarship, but more interesting is its premise: that the mass media not only should support any national venture abroad, but should do so with enthusiasm, such enterprises being by definition noble. In I982, when the Reagan administration was having trouble containing media reporting of the systematic killing of civilians by the Salvadoran army, Freedom House came through with a denunciation of the “imbalance” in media reporting from El Salvador.
Vivuli, Dak, Yor, and Uncle Junkal felt the tremors in town, where small items rolled off shelves and the citizenry wobbled around on shaky legs for the duration. But the tremor passed without major damage to buildings or structures.
Oh wait…. that’s already been done.
Once the knob turning happened the second time, I put my hand to my heart and just kept repeating “I release you! I release you! to Almighty God, go away you’re scaring me!” and finally the noise subsided. This wasn’t a one time knob turn, it was tried several times on both incidences. I have never been more terrified in my entire life and I know how crazy this sounds, but I know for certain that it was Rob at my door that night.
3) I have not found it compatible with writing books, which is where my heart really is. Am still struggling to find a way to balance the blogging and “real writing.” I have been able to do some real writing over the last month, so I have hope.
Libya has for many years managed and maintained one of the worlds’ most strategically placed terrorist training camps. During the 80’s, for example, people like Charles Taylor, former warlord and former President of Liberia, together with several other CIA-sponsored criminal elements, passed through the terrorist training camps of the World Revolutionary Headquarters in Libya.
“There won’t be any legal problem (with the survey),” said an official with the city’s personnel affairs section, adding that the results will be considered during personnel allocation.
Seoul Suburban – This is a great blog, and probably my favourite Korea specific blog. Two people, Charlie and Liz, pick a subway station, go there, walk around the area and then come pack and write a blog post about the location. It’s simple but perfect. Charlie writes magnificently, while Liz’s photos are also fantastic (she’s another photographer who’s work I enjoy – visit her website here). This blog really is your gateway into the Seoul that the tourist office don’t tell you about. And, you better believe this one is much more worthwhile!
Nazi leaders named Adolf
lady in Basic Grey houndstooth. She's ready to head out for a luncheon with her gloves and hat.
Now Twilight. A couple of years ago I got introduced to Twilight and thought it was something interesting to read, then I found out it was a nationwide interest with teenage girls. So I read all of the books and I ended up liking them, but now it seems too much. Actually from the sound of my little speech it makes it sound like Twilight is just not as superior to Harry Potter and that is not quite true but it is. Now don’t get me wrong I like the Twilight sage and have read the books and seen the first two movies, will see the next two mostly out of curisoity. I like the books and the movies are okay. To be honest the acting of some of the characters are not so great. It got better in the second movie but still there needs to be a lot of work. I hope the third movie is better than the first two.
Harvested (HRV CDR 031) - Interstellar Zappadrive.
The performances from Dujardin, Bejo, and even the dog are first-rate. Hazanvicius has made a masterpiece and love letter to film. Will The Artist be the first silent film since the 1920s to win the Academy Award for Best Picture? I don’t know. The voting patterns of the Academy confound me every year (even when I agree with them) so I’m not going to make a prediction just yet. I do know you should see this movie. It is beautiful. I need to Netflix the OSS 117 films just to see more of the Hazanvicius/Dujardin collaboration. This guy is a film-maker to watch and I can’t wait to see what he makes next, and with what techniques. In a perfect world this movie would open the door for a silent film renaissance, but the world we live in is far from perfect. Maybe it’s for the best. Copycat films would almost certainly fall short of the benchmark for quality set by this film. In the meantime, we have The Artist and that is more than enough.
I should have known that this is the kind of thing that happens when you start rolling with the big boys such as Molson Coors.
At this point, about 6:15pm, the hospital OB said to call my OB... she was watching my contractions and felt that if I had gone from 6-8 in no time, all this moving around probably was getting me ready for delivery. My doc breezed in at around 6:25, and the other doc was already saying she might have to deliver me. They got me on my back, and the discomfort returned full force. My OB checked me and said I was more than a 9, so they got me in position and suddenly the nurse was talking me through how to push. It all felt really surreal, like a dress rehearsal. In fact, I truly thought we were "practice pushing" the first two contractions, and was feeling good about her coaching me how to do it for when the "real pushing" began. Little did I know, this WAS the real pushing! And seriously--- that pushing felt WONDERFUL-- so great to finally have relief from the pressure!! (See what I mean? Perfect epidural!)
Well, it's supposed to be a hot topic, but sometimes... Oh, you'll just have to wait and see.
for the human voice, then spirals off into an eerie drone-
Prabhupada: Who said? Who is that rascal? The acarya does not require to be a pure devotee?
My eyes widened. “So… I can’t die…”
* Problems in sustaining satisfying relationships
They give suggestions to the kind of shoes, movies etc that you might like. They have ratings. They have everything for your TV viewing pleasure (except alcohol, fizzy drinks and popcorn of course, you’ll also have to buy a couch yourself, but the rest of it is awesome)
To complete this entry, more of N-’s description of the new philosophers: ‘they admit to a pleasure in…taking things apart, and to a certain levelheaded cruelty that knows how to handle a knife surely and subtly…they will be harder…they will not dally with “Truth”…they will have little faith that truthof all things should be accompanied by such amusements for our feelings…They will smile if somebody should say in front of them: “This thought elevates me; how could it fail to be true?”…They consider it no small disgrace for philosophy when people decree, as is popular nowadays…’
Our UCAS form, or UCCA form as it was called was handwritten and the personal statement consisted of one paragraph.
I knew that with my strong prescription and an immune disorder, I was at high risk for eye problems. But when I made it to college without major issues and my prescription stabilized, I relaxed. I got my eyes dilated once per year, rather than every six months: if there’s anything I hate more than the way dilation makes me feel, it’s those ridiculous ‘sunglasses’ they give you that fit inside your real glasses. And then, my doctor said ‘Oh.’
fragile faded paper
But to weigh the benefits or demerits of James Q. Wilson’s theory should be easier. Chad Freidrichs’s marvelous documentary The Pruitt Igoe Myth (2011) brings out the core problem brilliantly. While the St. Louis housing project has become notorious as a symbol of many things—the hopelessness of public housing, the failure of liberal efforts to help the poor, and, above all, the pathology of the poor themselves—the film reveals a forgotten history. Some former residents were forever scarred by their violent experiences at Pruitt-Igoe, but others looked back on the place with great fondness. Pruitt-Igoe was a step up for many of the former slum dwellers, who had left deep poverty in the South for dangerous, cramped conditions in the city. In the beginning, the projects were a sparkling mirage of upward mobility for poor families who had never had proper plumbing or electricity. It was the “poor man’s penthouse,” as one resident declared.
I was bored yesterday and decided to make a 6 inch cake. A decadent 6 inch cake. If I haven’t said so before…I will say it again.. this is the best chocolate cake ever. Yes.. ever.
Friends and Enemies
NOTE: Behold, the days come, saith the LORD, that I will make a new covenant with the house of Israel, and with the house of Judah: Not according to the covenant that I made with their fathers in the day that I took them by the hand to bring them out of the land of Egypt; which my covenant they brake, although I was an husband unto them, saith the LORD: But this shall be the covenant that I will make with the house of Israel; After those days, saith the LORD, I will put my law in their inward parts, and write it in their hearts; and will be their God, and they shall be my people. And they shall teach no more every man his neighbour, and every man his brother, saying, Know the LORD: for they shall all know me, from the least of them unto the greatest of them, saith the LORD: for I will forgive their iniquity, and I will remember their sin no more.
THERE WAS NO NEED!!! I didn’t like what happened to the old characters… and I just didn’t understand why she just changed the characters completely… I was really happy with Alex, Tom and Ellie, although some of them were annoying at parts, they just worked together… and Ilsa Bick just didn’t had to change it… because, in my opinion, THEY JUST DIDN’T WORK TOGETHER and it was too forced…
If Government wishes to reverse this apathetic trend people have towards politics it could start by ensuring that Parliamentarians adhere to the same employment, with regard to disciplinary procedures as civil servants.
Here’s a cheery reminder from a Globe and Mail story — Canada’s national daily — that women are screwed financially in old age if they devote their midlife time and resources, as many now do, to caregiving.
The first all-encompassing thing you have to mention about Koln is the Dom, or cathedral. I've seen a lot of European cathedrals in my day, and none come anywhere near touching this thing, not even St. Peter's Basilica in Rome.
Another idea my daughter with the new baby found were these reusable paper towels. They are a very cute way of replacing paper towels. We went as far as commissioning my mom who is a fabulous seamstress to make them for us. But then I found some simple microfiber towels in the automotive section of Target that I thought would work just fine.
If you have letters, feel free to send them in to PLFM at weaselworden@yahoo.com.
I mentioned the incident to a friend and tried to make myself feel better by saying, “I’m sure no one was looking at my feet.” After she stopped laughing she said, “This is L.A., feet are an accessory.” In fact, she had no sympathy whatsoever and scolded me for not getting a regular mani/pedi, comparing it to not washing down there. Excuse me? I’ll have you know I always wash down there; it’s the region far south of that equator that seems to have suffered a blow.
I was downtown a few days ago, and some friends and I went to lunch. We headed over to 505 Flower, which is an office tower that has an big underground shopping center beneath it. The shopping center is mostly restaurants and eateries, and I had a fantastic salad at a place called Salata, a Texas chain that opened their first California location last year.
Now if it takes the wiles of the weather and erosion to recycle rock to dirt, what happens if this process remains stagnant or slows down? One need only look to the Ancient Orient and Egypt to understand the consequences. Eight to three thousand years ago, the Fertile Crescent region of the Middle East was a much lusher and more prosperous area on the edge of a much smaller desert than it is now. The Sahara has grown tremendously. Since the Nile has been dammed, it no longer floods to replenish its source of nutrients for farming. The Tigris-Euphrates valley has become nearly a wasteland. The Garden of Eden has all but dried up.
she will hurt someone first.
The balance here is slightly on the malty side, with a supportive bitterness that carries the beer's moderate caramel and slightly roasted tones through to the finish. Consistent with what I'd come to discover with a previous batch fermented with 2450, this beer presents a little extra fruitiness that I tend not to prefer in my beers; in fact, my experience with this yeast tells me it does best (that is, agrees with my tastes most) when paired with a Pale-Ale-or-better helping of hops. So, and in accordance with my fondness for blending beers, when I drink this beer I tend to add a dash of something hoppy to help distract from those esters. Presently it's a Black IPA.
On June 17th it will be my one year Blogiversary.** When I started this blog, it was basically a way for me to consolidate my stories about my traveling for my friends, all in one place, so that I would not have to email all the time. I also wanted a place to put pictures, and the occasional snarky comment. I basically just wanted an online diary, for my own fun, and others, should they choose to read. I had no idea how addictive it would become, and honestly, how necessary for my sanity. I think blogging has gone a long way to making me a little more satisfied with my expat experience, something with which I have been struggling with over the past few years. I feel connected, now, and maybe a bit more understood, too. There are others who feel the way I do. Thank you for your support, it has meant so much.
Soulnese sings out Happy Hump Day! Lunch will be served today at 1454 Page Mill Rd., Palo Alto from 1130-130p. Get you’re Mac’N Roll on! SOLID!
Professor Skeaff said yesterday voluntary fortification of bread had contributed to the women’s improved folate status, but just how much was unclear because of the concurrent increase in the number of breakfast cereals and other foods that had folic acid added to them.
c) I have never mucked out a stall. However, I have watched other people do it and I’m not envious of it.
Then I crossed Chordi, a lovely little village, all cleanly swept and the houses all with washed verandahs, and bought some biscuits at a bakery which I again kept in the handle bag and kept popping now and then. I passed some forest department signs too and felt elated that I didn’t have to deal with them, I was just whizzing past them.
7:20am: While I was getting anesthetized the nurse chirped, “It’s happy hour in your IV!”
This week it has been light. No sun yet, but light still. And this has changed where we live.
The drug had been approved to fight off severe upper respiratory infections and Anthrax.
However, the statement by Astro Channel, which is owned by a multi-billionaire BN crony Ananda Krishnan, makes it clear that it puts so-called “National Content Regulations” before the independent and impartial news for which the BBC has a world-wide reputation.
While I'd wanted a daughter, God gave me a boy.
Tamil Nadu is India's most southern state with a population of over 66 million people. Tamil is its official language, spoken by almost 90% of the population. Tamil Nadu is culturally, linguistically, and ethnically Tamil. It is also literally located across the street from Sri Lanka. So why spend a month in a Malaysian jungle to get to Australia when you can find safety in Tamil Nadu in less than a week?
T.S. McPhee (Split Part Three)
The following days were full of team building activities, intense hiking, boat constructing, and creating an action plan to save an unreached tribe out in the wilderness. There were breaking points for many of us. Our food was instant mashed potatoes and baby formula (just add water!), with just enough for a hand full per person, one meal a day. We were running on no sleep because the tribe had woken us up in the middle of the night to complete a series of challenges to prove ourselves, and obviously, no food. We had bottled water that we used to stay hydrated.
1) KEEP YOUR CURRENT BANK ACCOUNT. If you’ve been with Wellsfargo or Bank of America for years, don’t drop them. Besides the likely Billpay services, mortgages, loans, etc. connected to your account, there are benefits to being a long-time customer (e.g. they’ll drop certain charges if you complain to a manager). Get an ATM debit card through your current bank. This will be your back-up card.
Next Friday I will talk about the ladies Bible study group that inspired Deb and I to write our 30 Minute Bible Studies.
Decorate as desired.
And so right now, I’m working daily to reshape my feelings about this whole situation. I can’t, in good conscience, send my child off to school in the morning in a cloud of anguish and anxiety. Nothing could be more unfair to her.
This is called Lost in the Stars by bruceseeds on Etsy. If someone wanted to buy me one of these, I could keep my resolution and not try making one...nah, I'd still want to make one.
1172 ***D-X/1/1993. “Can Beauty ‘Hallow Even the Bloodiest Tomahawk’? On ‘The Killers,’ ‘A Good Man Is Hard to Find,’ and ‘The Silence of the Lambs.’” First Friday Lecture Series, The Basic Program, The University of Chicago, The Cultural Center, Chicago Public Library, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-1993(5), above, pp. 2-18.)
